LETTER I.
To Aunt Keziah Downing
, wife of Uncle Joshua,
Postmaster
of Downingville, away down East in the State of
Maine.
New York
,
May
3, 1845.
Dear Aunt
:I s'pose you begin to think by this
time it's a good while since I writ to you; but the
truth is, any body might as well try to write a
letter
in a hornet's nest as to try to write one in New
York any time for a month before the first of May,
especially if they live in a hired house and expect
to have to move when May-day comes round; and
that I take it is the case with jest about one half
the New Yorkers about every year. It's an awful
custom, and where it come from I can't find out;
but it has used me up worse than building forty
rods of stone wall, or chopping down ten acres of
trees. I haint had my clothes off for a week, and
I haint had a quiet night's rest for a month; and
the way my bones have ached would be enough to
make a horse cry his eyes out.
I couldn't write anything to-day but about
house-hunting
and moving if I should try. Jest to give
you a little insight into the common run of this ere
business, I'll lay down some of the outlines of it
before I undertake to tell you how we got through
the scrape outselves. There's two sorts of folks in
this city; and it's such an everlastin' great concern
you may well suppose ther's about as many as
you could shake a stick at of both sorts. One sort
is them that
lets
houses, and t'other sort is them
that
hires
. They call 'em here, landlords and
tenants
.
And the way they use each other up isn't
slow, I can tell you. They have a regular war
every year. The manuvering and twisting, and
crowding, and quarrelling, begins to come on in
February, and it grows hotter and hotter till the
first day of May, when they have the great regular
pitched battle. And then sich a rumpus, and sich
a route I don't think the world ever see any where
else. The children of Israel, that we read about
in the Bible, going out of Egypt with their flocks
and their little ones, wasn't no touch to it. The
landlords generally lead, because they have the
most money to carry on the war; but that don't
discourage the tenants so but that they renew the
fight again the next year as hard as ever. The
tussle is all about the price of rents; the landlords
want to get 'em up higher, and the tenants want to
get 'em down lower; and when so many thousand
of 'em on both sides fairly come to the scratch,
they make hot work of it.
The landlords have a way here sich as I don't
think they have any where else in the world, of
letting
their houses for just exactly one year from the
first day of May, twelve o'clock at noon. And
they make the tenants hire the houses in February
for the next year. And if they don't hire 'em then,
and agree to pay what the landlord asks, he puts a
handbill on to the house, saying this house to let,
and the first day of May, at twelve o'clock, if the
tenant isn't out, an officer goes and puts him into
the street neck and heels, with his wife and children,
and all his housen-stuff, whether they have any
place to put their heads in or notthat is, if the
tenant has paid up his rent; if he hasn't, the
landlord
nabs the housen-stuff and sells it at vandue.
They build all sich great costly houses here, that
nobody but smart folks that's got plenty of money
can live in a whole house to themselves; so
common
sort of folks have to take parts of houses.
We've been living most of the time since we've
been here, in the third story of one of 'Squire
Sharp's houses. 'Squire Sharp is a little
black-eyed
,
slender, peaked-nosed man, that looks as
though he might crawl through a square of seven
by nine glass, if the glass was fairly out, and not
squeeze him neither. Now most of the great rich
folks, that own so many houses here, are large, fat,
red-faced men, that ride about in their carriages
most of the time, and when they walk look as
though they'd step right over common folks' heads.
They get most of their rents, because their tenants
are so awful 'fraid of 'em, that they about as lieves
die as not to pay 'em. But it aint so with 'Squire
Sharp. Somehow, nobody don't seem to be afraid
of him, and yet he don't loose hardly any of his
rents. He's the keenest hand to make a bargain
that ever I see, and he gets his rents by looking
after
'em; he fairly dogs it out of his tenants; and
if any of 'em happen to give him the slip, he's as
keen as a bloodhound to scent 'em out, and he'll
follow 'em day and night till he gets it. He's as
thin as a bed-post, and always looks as holler as if
he hadn't eat any thing for a week. But he's a rich
man for all that. He owns the whole block where
we've been living, seven or eight great three story
brick houses, besides ever so many more round the
city.
We had two rooms and two bedrooms, as I said
afore, in the third story. Cousin Nabby and the
two youngest children slept in one bedroom, and
Jacky and Ichabod in t'other bedroom, and wife
and I in one of the large rooms. T'other room we
had to cook and eat in. I paid eighty dollars a
year rent. When I went to hire it, I wasn't
dressed
very slick, and 'Squire Sharp looked at me as
much as five minutes, and eyed me from top to toe
before he give me any answer. At last, says he,
Who's your security?
Says I, I never asked any body to be
bondsman
for me yet in my life, and I shan't begin
to-day
,
I guess.
So I turned round and was going to clear out.
But says he,
Stop, Mister! I don't know as it will make
much odds; for I always let them third stories
payable weekly in advance; and you can have it
in that way for eighty dollars a year.
As I couldn't do any better jest then, I concluded
to take it; so we moved in. Every Monday
morning
for three weeks the 'Squire come round as
regular as clock-work, and took his week's advance.
But about the middle of the fourth week, which was
the second or third day of February, he come in
and says he,
Major Downing, I've come to see if you are
going
to engage this tenement for the next year?
Well, 'Squire, says I, I guess I can tell you
that better when this year is out. And besides,
'Squire, you know I don't hire your house by the
year; I hire it by the week.
It isn't so, says he; you hire it by the year,
and
pay
by the week.
But how can I hire by the year, says I, when
you told me, at the time I hired it, that you couldn't
engage it only till the first of May?
Why, says he, all our rent years begin the
first of May, and I let it to you for the balance of
the year. Now, if you are a mind to engage it for
a year from the first of May, payable weekly in
advance, you can have it; and I'll draw up the
writings and have 'em fixed to-day.
But, 'Squire, says I, now, how onreasonable
that is! Only jest think of it: Here it is three months
before the first of May, and who knows but what
we may all be dead before that time? And besides
I may have some business to do somewhere else by
that time, and shan't want to live here any longer.
No, no, 'Squire; let these three months run out, and
then, if I want to stay here, and we can agree, I'll
hire it again.
At that the 'Squire colored up a little, and says
he, Major Downing, I can't do any sich thing. If
you want the house next year, you must engage it
now, and sign the papers; if not, I shall put a bill
on the house, `
to let
.' I can't break over any of
our rules.
Well, says I, 'Squire, I never was drove yet
by any man in my life, and I guess I shan't be
to-day
.
You may do as you like; but as for hiring a
house before I know whether I shall want it or not,
I shan't do no sich thing.
At that the 'Squire cleared out and went off. The
next morning I heard a little hammering on the side
of the house, and I looked out, and there was the
'Squire, nailing up a bill, with large letters on it,
THIS HOUSE TO LET. And I looked along, and I
see there was jest sich a bill on every house in the
block. Thinks I, what's to pay now? I guess some
terrible overturn has happened to the 'Squire or his
tenants, to break 'em all up in a heap so. I felt
kind of uneasy about it; so, after breakfast, I took
my hat, and went out, and walked a mile or two
about the city. And I soon found that whatever
the trouble might be between the 'Squire and his
tenants, the same trouble had spread all over the
city; for in every street I went through, it seemed
to me one half the houses had bills on 'em, to let.
Well, thinks I, I'm glad I didn't engage that house
of 'Squire Sharp, for there's sich an everlastin'
sight of houses to let now, it's a wonder to me if I
don't find one pretty cheap. So I went home, and
told Polly all New York was to let, and I guessed
we should find a house next year cheap enough.
I hadn't hardly got sot down after I come in,
before
I heard a knock at the door; and says I come
in. And in come a great, stout, fat, squaddy
woman
,
and says she, I see this tenement in the third
story, is to let, and I jest want the privilege of
looking
at it a little to see if I can make it do for my
family.
Certainly, marm, says I, for I always pride
myself
in bein perlite to the ladies. Polly, jest show
the lady the rooms. So Polly went round to show
her the house.
Which is the parlor? said the fat lady.
This is the fore-room, said Polly; but we
use it to sleep in as we are rather scant of room.
Oh, marcy, said the fat lady; how can
anybody
think of living without a parlor? It must be
dreadful vulgar. Well, which is the kitchen?
So Polly showed her the kitchen, though she was
jest cooking dinner, and the dinner things was all
round jest as it happened. I see Polly felt a little
uneasy about it, and colored up when she asked to
go into the kitchen, for you know, Aunt, that Polly,
though I say it myself, was always as neat as
waxwork
,
and never could bear to have anybody look
into the kitchen unless everything was put up as
neat as a pin. Howsomever, she opened the door,
and the fat lady marched in.
Oh, marcy on us, said she, this'll never do for
my family at all. There's no convenience about it;
only one little stived up closet. Oh, it'll never do
for me at all; how can you get along with it?
Polly told her it wasn't so handy as some kitchens,
but we made out to do with it very well.
Well said she, let me see the sleeping rooms.
So Polly opened the bed-room doors; and the
fat lady lifted up her hands and declared she would
as soon sleep in a pig's pen and done with it, as to
go into sich little mean stived up places as them.
Then she went back again into the kitchen, and
looked into the closet, and examined the dishes of
bread and butter, and cold meat that was left the
day before, and said it was a shame for landlords
to build sich ill-contrived houses. Then she took
a chair and sot down, for she had talked so much
she began to grow a little wheezy. At last she
declared she wouldn't live in the house if they would
give it to her. I begun to get a little riled, and told
her I guessed she better not think of hiring it then,
for I was pretty sure she would find it an awful
tiresome business to go up and down three pair of
stairs. At that she got up and went out, and
slammed
the door tu pretty hard after her, and never
said boo to one of us.
Well, this was only just the beginning of trouble,
for arter that there was a steady stream of folks
coming in to look at the house for about two
months, commonly as much as five or six a day and
sometimes more; and you may guess a little from
the account of the fat lady what sort of a time we
had of it. At last, about the first of April, I looked
out one day and I see Squire 'Sharp come and take
down the bill of third story to let. And though I
knew then I should have to move, whether or no,
I felt glad the bill was down, because it would stop
that everlasting stream of folks coming in and
botherin
of us so every day. Polly began to grow
uneasy
now, because we hadn't got no house, and
said I ought to go a house hunting jest as every
body
else did, or else we should be turned out of doors
bime by. So I told her I'd go at it next day, and
make a business of it, and follow it up till I got a
house. Accordingly the next day I went at it, and
I found it a pesky sight worse job than I expected.
The bills wasn't near so thick as they was two or
three weeks before; but still I thought they was so
plenty, there would be no trouble in finding a house.
I went round the upper part of the city, because
folks said rents was a good deal cheaper up there
than down in town. At last I found part of a house
that I thought looked as if it would do nicely; and
looked at the bill and it said inquire sich a number
in Wall street. Well, I started off to Wall street,
and after walking about two miles and a half I got
there and found the place, and come to inquire the
rent, it was two hundred and fifty dollars. I couldn't
afford to give more than eighty or a hundred
dollars
rent, so back I went to take another hunt. At
last I found one that looked as though it might be
a good deal cheaper, and I looked at the bill, and
that said inquire at another number in Wall street.
So I posted down again and found the place and
inquired the rent. It was a hundred and fifty
dollars
.
I was studying the matter over to see if it
would do for me to think of giving so much, when
the man asked me how much family I had. I told
him there was myself and wife and cousin Nabby
and six children. At that, says he, We never let
it to children; and he shot the door and went in.
So there I found I was up a tree again. I had got
so tired by this time, and it had got to be towards
night, that I thought I would give it up for a bad
days work, and go home. When I got home I
found Polly almost tired to death, for she had felt
so uneasy for fear we should be turned out of doors
bime by, that she had been out most all day
house-hunting
too. But she hadn't made out any better
than I did. I told Polly she better stay at home
and take care of the children, and not worry
herself
about it, and I'd foller the business up till I got
a house at some rate or other. So the next
morning
I started again, and I trampoosed the city from
one end to 'tother, lengthways, and crossways, and
cornerways; but I didn't make out any better than
I did the day before. In the morning I would find
a bill on a house that looked as if it might do, and
come to read it, it would say, to be seen only from
two to five in the afternoon; and in the afternoon I
would find a bill that would say, to be seen only
from ten to twelve in the morning. And then again
I would see a house that looked about right, and I
would step up to the door and ask if I might look at
it, and they would say, that they had so much
trampling over the house they couldn't have any
more of it, and shet the door and go in. Wherever
I went I see the streets was full of folks
house-hunting
,
and half the time when I went to look at a bill,
there would be so many others bobbing up onto
the steps before me that I would have to wait most
half an hour before I could get a chance to read
it. And when I did get up to it, as likely as
not it would say, This house to let to a small,
genteel
family,
without children;
so there I would be
dished again. Once I stood on the steps, reading a
bill, and there was a great, fat, greasy-faced
woman
stood right afore me, facing it, reading it tu.
She was a cross, sour-looking thing, and looked as
if she had lived on hog's fat all her lifeand I think
it is pretty likely she had, for the city is full of hogs.
You would see more hogs here, in walking the
streets for half an hour, than you would see in
Downinville for a whole year. Well, as I stood
opposite that old grease spot, reading the bill, there
come up sich a crowd behind me to read the bill
tu, that they knocked my head right into her
bonnet
.
By the gracious if my ears didn't ring again!
She slapped her great square hand against the side of
my head so hard, it almost knocked me off the steps.
You saucy, good for nothing brute, says she,
and her eyes were starting out of her head as big
as an ox's eyes when he's drawing a heavy load
haint you no more manners? says she, set out
to kiss me so, right here in the street tu, and afore
all these folks?
I told her upon my word and honor it was no
sich thing. 'Twas the folks behind me that pushed
me, and I hadn't the least thought in the world of
kissing her. At that I thought she looked crosser
than she did afore, and I jumped off the steps and
got away as fast as I could. I went home that
night pretty well tired out, and most discouraged
about finding a house. But I see Polly grew more
uneasy; so I started again next morning, and kept
it up right and tight every day for pretty near a
fortnight, till I got the bottoms of my shoes all wore
off. Then I stopped one day and got 'em tapped
and rested upon 't, and then I went at it again. At
last, in the course of my travels, I found three
houses that I thought might do, if I couldn't do any
better. But the rents was a little too high. They
asked me $90 to $100 a-piece for 'em. I thought
they hadn't ought to be more than $80. And folks
told me that them that didn't let their houses till
about the first of May would have to put their rents
down. So I concluded to watch these 'ere three
houses, and hold on till the last day of April. One
was way over towards the North River, pretty
well up town, on a cross street leading out of
Greenwich
street. Two rooms and two bedrooms, on
the second floor. The next was away over 'tother
way, beyond the Bowery, towards the East River,
and pretty well up towards the Dry Dock. One
room in the basement, three in the third story, and
one in the attic, if wanted. But the basement was
awful wet. 'Tother one was away up the Third
avenue, not far from the Alms House. It took me
about half the day, every day for a fortnight, to go
round to these three houses and see that the bills
were still on. For I thought as long as I could have
my choice of the three I was safe. Well, when it
come to be the last day of April, I thought it was
time to bring matters to a close. So in the course
of the forenoon I walked away up to the Third
avenue
;
that house being a little the cheapest rent I
thought on the whole, bein times was very dull, I
better take that. They asked ninety-five dollars,
but would take ninety for a good tenant. I
walked
along, thinking I'd try 'em pretty hard for
eighty
dollars; and if I couldn't get it for that, I'd offer
'em eighty-five; and if they wouldn't let it for that,
I'd take it for ninety.
At last I came in sight of the house, and looked,
but I couldn't see no bill on it. I went up and
asked
if the house was let, and they said yes, it was let
about an hour ago. I turned about and quickened
my steps, and walked away down towards the East
River house, and thought I'd take it right off, if I
had to give as much as ninety-five dollars for it.
Or even I didn't know as I should stick at a
hundred
.
When I got in sight of that house, the bill
was off of that too. This made me feel a little
streaked, and the sweat started out on my forehead
pretty fast. I stepped up and asked them if the
house was let. They said yes, it was let that
morning, and they could a let two or three more
jest like it if they'd had 'em. I begun to be afraid
now I'd got into rather a bad box. I didn't dare
to go home and tell Polly how things looked; and
as it was now but little arter noon, I thought I'd run
round two or three streets, and see if I couldn't
hunt up some houses. So I pulled foot, and hunted
and sweat, till I got so tired I couldn't but jest
stand. There was a good many bills up, but
somehow
I couldn't find any that would seem to do.
They was all too high rent, or they wouldn't take
children, or something or other was in the way. I
felt pretty bad. So I thought I'd go home and tell
Polly the worst on't, and go up and see if the
Greenwich
house was gone too. When I come to tell
her about it, she showed a little dander.
Now, Jack, says she, if you
have
delayed so
long that we've lost the chance of getting a house,
and have to be turned out of doors to-morrow, I
shall lay it all to you, every bit of it. I must say
you might a known better.
Now Polly doesn't hardly ever give me a hard
word, and come to have this from her, poured right
on top of the trouble I was in about a house, made
me feel bad, aunt Keziah, I can tell you. But I told
Polly, frettin wouldn't help the matter a bit, and if
she'd give me a mouthful of bread and butter, I'd
go and try once more. At that she come tu a
little
,
and sot on some bread and butter, and then we
started off together. We went all round over the
place they call Greenwich village, though if I was
to die I couldn't tell it from the city; but we didn't
find a single house or part of a house that would
seem to do, till we got up to a cross street, where
the house was that I'd picked out afore. As soon
as we turned round the corner, and come in sight
of that are house, I looked and the bill was on. If
I'd a had a half a ton weight took off my shoulders
I couldn't a felt lighter than I did that minit. It
was about sunset, and the last day of April. The
old folks that owned the house, and lived in the
lower part of it, were standing out on the steps and
looking very wistfully, first up the street and then
down the street, and I knew by their looks they felt
as if it was their last chance, for if they didn't let it
that night, may be they wouldn't let it for the whole
year. I give Polly's arm a jerk, and whispered to
her, and says I, Now do you keep still as a mouse
and not appear as though we wanted a house much,
and I'll get that house for lower rent yet.
We walked along up in a careless kind of a way,
as if we wasn't looking for any thing. Then we
stopped a little and looked up to the house, and
says I,
Mister, you've got to let your house lay over
this year, haven't you?
Well, says he, I don't know; the man that
talked of taking it hasn't come yet; but he may be
here this evening.
Well, Mister, says I, what'll you take for
them rooms in the second story?
Aint you suited yet? says he, eyeing us very
sharp, and stepping down off the steps.
Not exactly, says I. If I could get your
house low enough, I don't know but I might take
it.
Well, says he, I've calculated to get a
hundred
dollars for it; but bein it's getting late I'll let
it go for ninety.
I told him I couldn't give that, but if he'd a mind
to let it go for seventy I'd take it. He said he
couldn't think of that; though he didn't know, for
a good tenant and good security, he might say
eighty, to a quiet family without children.
At that, Polly couldn't help putting in a word in
spite of all I'd said to her; and says she,
I should like to know how the New Yorkers
expects folks to get along in this world without
children.
Ah, then you have children, said the old
gentleman
,
changing his manner in a moment. Well,
there's a great difference in children. Some
families
keep 'em very quiet, while in others they are
desput troublesome. I dare say you keep yourn in
good order.
Well, says I, I must be agoin; I can't think
of paying eighty dollars. And I began to edge
along a little.
Mister, says he, if you take the house, what
kind of security will you give me?
Oh, says I, I'll pay the rent every week in
advance, if you want it. But I can't give eighty
dollars.
Well, says he, you may have it for
seventy-five
,
and that's the lowest.
I'll take it, says I, and here's a silver dollar
to bind the bargain till I move in.
At that the old man took down the bill, and Polly
and I turned to go home to get ready for the great
battle the next day.
And now, Dear Aunt Keziah, I've got to break
right off short, for the printer says I've spun my
yarn out so long he can't wait for any more. But
I'll try to give you an account of the
moving
in my
next letter. Give my love to Uncle Joshua, and I
remain your loving nephew,
Major Jack Downing
.
LETTER II.
To Aunt Keziah Downing
, wife of Uncle Joshua, of
Downingville
,
Maine.
New-York
,
May
5
th
, 1845.
Dear Aunt
:In my last letter, I told you
something
about
house-hunting
in New-York, and the
terrible bother landlords and tenants get into every
spring; but the story was so long I had to break
off before I said half what I wanted to. And now
I am going to try to tell you something about
moving
day
. Oh, of all the days in this 'ere world, and I've
seen a good many kinds of days in my life-time
I've seen trainin' days, and muster days, and
independent
days, and when I lived in Washington
along with General Jackson, bless the dear old
man! we used to have Christmas and New-Year's
days; but of all the days that ever I did see in this
'ere world, moving-day in New-York is the
cap-sheaf
.
It is no more like the May-days we used to
have in Downingville, than a toad under a harrow
is like a man on horseback. You know what good,
pleasant times we used to have when the first day
of May come round in Downingville, how
everything
in the house was all slicked up a day or two
beforehand as neat as a pin, and the things in every
room all sot to rights, and the children's faces all
washed, and their heads combed, and their clean
clothes all ready for 'em to put on. And then,
about sunrise May morning, what a scampering
there was among the children! They'd come
darting
out of all the houses like flocks of new
butterflies
,
all dressed up as neat as pinks, and their eyes
glistening and shining like glass buttons. And away
they'd fly in whole swarms across the fields, and up
on the hills, and away in the woods; and when they
come back to breakfast you couldn't tell which was
the reddest, their cheeks or the bunches of flowers
they had in their hands. And every part of
Downingville
all day would smell as sweet as a rose.
But 'taint so in New-York, aunt Keziah, not by a
jug-full. Everything here on a May-day looks
amazin' different, and smells amazin' different, I can
tell you. But I'll try and see if I can give you some
little notion of it. To begin where I left off in my
last letter: When I got through making a bargain
with old Mr. Johnson, that's the name of the man I
hired the house ofwhen I got through, and the old
man took the bill down off the house, and I felt sure
at last that we'd got a house to go into next day,
and shouldn't have to be turned out of doors, Polly
and I turned about to go home, a good deal
lighter-hearted
than we had been before for a fortnight. It
was jest beginning to grow dark a little, and we
had a considerable ways to go, round ever so many
corners, and through a good many streets; but
don't you think there were so many lights it was
jest as easy going as it would be in the day time.
In all the streets there was long rows of lamps lit
on both sides of the streets as fur as you could see;
and you might go round miles and miles, and turn
which way you would, you couldn't see no end to
lamps. I'll say that for New-York, it's a good
deal easier getting about here in the night time than
it is in Downingville.
Well, Polly and I jogged along towards home,
but we hadn't gone a great ways before we begun
to see other great lights in the streets than lamps;
and they begun to grow thicker and thicker in all
the streetsgreat blazing fires, as big as we used
to have in the fields when we were burning off
brush in the spring. What under the sun can all
these fires mean? says I. I begun to be afraid the
tenants had come off so bad in the battle with the
landlords this time, that they might be layin' a plan
to burn up the whole city at once. But Polly said
she didn't believe but what they'd begun to turn
them folks that hadn't got no houses into the streets
already, and they was building up fires to stay by
in the night. Poor critters! says she, how I do
pity 'em! for I know that's what it is. I told her
no, she might depend upon't, 'twasn't the rule to
turn 'em out till next day at twelve o'clock precisely.
By this time we got along into a shabby looking
street, chock full of hogs and boys, and you couldn't
hardly tell which looked the cleanest, or behaved
the best, the hogs or the boysnor hardly which
was the thickest. Here we come along to one of
these ere great fires, and stopt a few minutes to
look at it. There was fifty boys round it, poking
it with sticks, and hollering and screaming like
bedlam
.
At last, says I to a little boy that stood near
me
My lad, what's the meaning of all these ere
great fires about the streets to-night?
Nothing, says he, only jest burning up the
old straw.
What old straw? says I.
Why, the old beds, says he; every body
burns up the old straw to night.
But, says I, If every body burns up their
beds to-night, what 'll they do to sleep on
to-morrow
night?
Oh, says he, they can get enough more to
the flour and feed stores to-morrow.
At that all the other boys, that had been a looking
and listening to hear what we said, sot up such a
giggling and a hurraying, it fairly made some of the
four-legged pigs snort and run. And then one
little
sassy rascal come up within about ten foot of
me, and stood and put his thumb up agin the side
of his nose, and looked up with an awful sassy look
at me, and hollered out, ain't ye green? And
then he pulled foot and run for fear I should be arter
him. But I didn't mind nothin' about him, though
the boys all laffed again as if they'd split.
Bimeby
out came a couple of dirty looking gals from a
dirty looking house, lugging along a straw bed,
and emptied it on to the fire.
Whorah, said the boys, as they run with their
sticks and poked the straw into the fire
Whorah
;
now for roast bed-bugs and fleas. Hark,
only hear the flees roar; and them bed-bugs crack
and snap like burning hemlock.
Hold your tongues, you sassy brutes, said the
gals.
At that the boys took arter 'em full chisel with
handfulls of burning straw, and the gals run as if a
catamount had been arter 'em till they got into the
house.
Polly give my arm a jerk, and begged of me to
make haste out of the street. We jogged along
again towards home, and we didn't get into any
other street quite so bad as that, though we went
through a number that didn't smell any too sweet,
I can tell you. At last we got home and found
cousin Nabby most out of patience waiting for us;
she'd had supper ready an hour, and the youngest
children was very tired and fretty. So we sot
down to supper, and before we 'd got half through,
somebody knocked at the door.
Come in, says I. And the door opened, and
in came an Irishman with a basket full of dishes, as
much as he could lug. And says he, Plase yer
honor.
You know, aunt Keziah, how queer these ere
Irishmen talk; it's enough to make a body laff till
his sides aches to hear em talk so broad and
ungrammatical
.
Plase yer honor, says he, mistress Pinkham
wants to know if ye'll be so kind as to be after
obleeging her so much as to do her a little kindness
jest to let her reposite a few things in one of your
rooms to-night. It 'ill be very convaniant for her
indade.
Who
is
Miss Pinkham? says I.
It's the lady that's rinted this tinement, yer
honor, says he, and it 'll be very convaniant for
her, if you'll allow her.
Oh, yes, says I, I'm always glad to do a lady
a favor if I can; you may set 'em into the fore
room there an' welcome.
Before he'd got 'em half took out of the basket,
in come another chap, luggin four chairs. And then
followed a boy with a dish kettle in one hand, filled
up with a mess of little things, and the shovel and
tongs in 'tother. Then in comes a little gal with a
looking glass, and brought it along to Polly, and
says she,
Ma wants you to set this away very careful, for
she wouldn't have it broke for anything in the
world, 'twould be sich a bad sign.
So Polly got up and took the glass and hung it on
a nail by the side of ourn. By the time we'd done
supper, all hands had been back, and came lugging
in another load, and piled it up in the fore-room.
And the little girl said, Ma would come round
bime by and see about stoin it away. And back
they all went for another load. I see that Polly
and cousin Nabby begun to feel a little nettled;
but I told them 'twasn't best to mind it: we should
be off to-morrow, and we could put up with a little
trouble for one night, jest for the sake of doin a
kindness.
Presently in they come again with as much as
they could lug, of all sorts of housen-stuff that you
could think on. And at last Miss Pinkham herself
come puffin and blowin up three pair of stairs, and
come boltin into the kitchen where we was all
setting
;
and who should it be but that same great fat
lady that I told about in my last letter, come to
examine
the rooms the first day the bill was up in
February. I didn't feel over and above good
natured
when I come to see who she was. Polly
looked as though she felt a little wiry, and cousin
Nabby looked as red as a flash. I'm commonly
pretty plain-spoken, you know, ant; so says I,
Miss Pinkham, have you hired these ere
rooms?
Yes, says she, I've rented 'em for a year.
Well, says I, what did 'Squire Sharp give
you to take 'em?
Do you mean, says she, what rent I pay for
em?
No, says I, what does 'Squire Sharp give
you to take 'em?
Well, says she, I don't understand sich a
question as that; so you may as well leave off your
jokes.
But when you was here lookin at these ere
rooms, last February, says I, you said you
wouldn't live in 'em if any body'd give 'em to you.
Well, says she, I thought I shouldn't like 'em
very well at first; but on the whole I think it's
quite a nice placethe rooms are so snug and
genteel
.
Why, yes, says I, I think it quite a good place
for eighty dollars.
Eighty dollars! says she, I hope you don't
think I give eighty dollars for it. I know how to
work Squire Sharp better than that. I run it down
to him to the lowest notch; told him there wasn't
a single convenience about it; only one little
stived
up closet, and 'twas all up and down stairs, and
I didn't believe he could hardly hire a decent family
to live there. I offered him fifty dollars, and stuck
to it about two months, and he stuck to eighty, and
said he wouldn't take a penny less. But at last this
morning, I asked him if he was going to let me
have the rooms for fifty dollars; if not I was going
right off to take another house that I had had the
offer of a great deal cheaper. At that he looked as
if he'd bite a board nail off, and says he, if you're a
mind to give me sixty dollars you may have it, and
that's the lowest. Nobody shall have it for less
than that if I have to shut it up for a whole year.
Well I told him I'd take it; so I got it for sixty
dollars
,
and glad enough was I, for I'd made up my
3
mind to give eighty if I couldn't get it for no less.
And now if you'll jest let me stow away a few
things here to-night, it'll be a great convenience to
me. It's sich an awful job to move May-day, I
want to get clear of as much of it as I can.
You know, I'm one of those sort of folks, if any
body asks a favor of me, I can't never refuse, so I
told her yes, she might stow in what she'd a mind
to. But I didn't s'pose she was going to bring in
much more, for they'd got our fore room piled up
so full then that we couldn't hardly get across it to
go to bed. You know Polly and I had our bed in
the fore-room, because we hadn't ony two sleepin
rooms, and cousin Nabby and the two youngest
children slept in one, and Jacky and Ichabod in
'tother. So I thought of course she wouldn't bring
in nothin more that night, ony put to rights a little
what was already there, bein it was getting pretty
late in the evening. But I was mistaken, for we
hadn't hardly done talking, when her regiment of
Irishmen and boys and gals come clattering up the
stairs again with loads of barrels and bedsteads,
and pots and kettles, and washstands, and chairs,
and baskets of tin dishes, and I don't know what
all. Poor Polly began to look a little streaked, and
I thought myself it was crowdin a little too hard.
So I told Miss Pinkham I thought she better let the
rest be till mornin, for if they brought in much more
we should all get mixed up so bime by, 'twould be
difficult to pick our things out when we came to
move. But she said, O no, she'd help to do all
that; and 'twould be so very convenient for her to
bring in a few more things to-night; and 'twouldn't
be any trouble to us at all. And then she turns
round to her company, and says she, `Come, boys
and gals, make haste back and bring in some more
as fast as you can.
Then she went along to our bed and felt of it,
and says she, Oh, marcy, you havn't carried out
your straw yet; I hope you aint a goin to leave
that till to-morrow; 'twill clutter the house all up
when we shall want to be a setting up our things.
Do pray carry it out to-night; there's fires enough
in the street now.
At that Polly said she guessed I better carry it
out, as she sposed 't was the custom for every body
to do it. So at it I went and carried down the
straw beds, and lugged them off a few rods to one
of the fires, and emptied 'em out. As I turned
round the corner by tother end of our block, there
was a couple of men walked before me, talking
together
,
and I knew in a minute one of em was
'Squire Sharp's voice. T'other one was a short fat
gentleman, that seemed to be in a good deal of a
pet because he couldn't let his houses.
What, havn't you let yourn yet, says the
Squire.
No, says the fat gentleman, I've got six good
houses now that aint let, besides several parts.
Hang the housen, and tenants too. I wish I didn't
own one. If all my property was in bank stock, or
something else, that would bring me four per cent.
I should be glad.
Well, says 'Squire Sharp, I always make it
a pint to let all my tenements before the first of
May, whether or no. If I can't get one price I take
another; and I makes all my houses net me eight
per cent, good.
Thinks I, Mr. Fat gentleman, if you was as lean
as 'Squire Sharp is, and looked after your houses
as close, you'd get eight per cent, too.
I always think it's the best way, says 'Squire
Sharp, to let 'em at all events before the first of
May, and get what you can. And then be sure and
look arter the rents and not loose 'em. I didn't let
my last tenement till this morning. I always asked
eighty dollars for it; but I let it go for sixty. And
if the woman had sot out to a gone away without
taking of it, I should a let her had it for fifty. But
the main thing is to collect your rent, after all, I
don't think I've lost fifty dollars of my rent these five
years.
Zounds, said the fat gentleman, I've lost more
than three thousand during that time. But I'm
determined
to look after em more close in future.
Now I think on't there's Miss Pinkham owes me
more than two quarters rent now; and I'll nab
her furniture the first thing to-morrow morning
arter breakfast; for I've been told she's a little
slippery about rents.
She's the very woman, says the Squire, that
took my tenement this morning. But I'm safe, for
I make her pay weekly in advance. That's the
way I serve all my tenants that I aint sure about.
Well, said the fat gentleman, I guess you'll
have to let your rooms to somebody else arter all;
for I'm determined to stop Miss Pinkham's furniture
to-morrow morning, the first thing arter breakfast.
At that I couldn't help laffin in my sleeve a
little, for I thought I could begin to see how the cat
was jumpin'. And thinks I, Mr. fat gentleman, I
guess you aint in the habit of getting up any too
early in the morning; and I shouldn't be afraid to
wage a large potato you wont be up in time to nab
that are housen-stuff of Miss Pinkham's arter all.
By this time I'd got out of their hearing, and they
went along, and I went home. When I went up
stairs, I found they'd got the floor of the fore room
all covered with housen-stuff, from one to two feet
deep, and had begun to pile it up round the kitchen:
and Miss Pinkham was hurrying her boys and gals
and her stout Irishman to make haste and bring in
as fast as they could. And they kept it agoin right
and tight till about midnight, and then I could see
by the tag ends of all sorts of matters and things
that begun to come along, that they was about
winding up the business.
Polly is naterally very kind, you know, and hates
to hurt any body's feelings, or disappoint 'em if she
can help it; so she tried to put up with it the best
way she could. But she begun to grow most
heart-sick
about it; for you know how neat Polly always
keeps everything about her house, and a good deal
of Miss Pinkham's truck that they'd piled about our
fore-room and kitchen was dirty enough to turn a
dog's stomach. And there we'd got to sleep right
among it till next morning. But still Polly didn't
make no complaints, though I see she felt bad
enough. Cousin Nabby had got tired and gone to
bed with the two youngest children about ten
o'clock. Jacky and Ichabod had kept their eyes
wide open till eleven, and then they begun to nod
about and fall over the housen-stuff, so we sent
them off to bed in 'tother bed-room. And now
the clock had struck midnight, and Polly and I
grew very tired and sleepy, and hoped Miss
Pinkham
and her boys and gals would clear out and let
us have a little chace to rest afore morning. But
when they got through bringing up their truck, the
Irishman stepped up to her and asked for his
pay. She told him to call the next day. But he
said no, he was to have his pay as soon as his work
was done. She told him he seemed to be dreadful
fraid of losing two shillings; but she shouldn't pay
him till next day at any rate. He said it wasn't
two shillings; he was to have half a dollar, and he
was to have his pay that night, and he would have
it, and he wouldn't go away without it, at all, at all.
At that she ketched up a chair and told him if
he didn't get down stairs in a minit she'd beat his
brains out, a good-for-nothin' imperdent brute.
And down the feller run as if he'd break his neck,
and whether he's got his half dollar yet I don't
know. Polly looked as if she'd faint away, but I
told her I'd seen worse squalls than that, when I
used to live to Washington, with Gineral Jackson.
Now we've got all our things here, says Miss
Pinkham, I guess we'll spread down the carpet,
and some rugs and bedclothes, and sleep here in
the kitchen to-night, for I wouldn't disturb you in
'tother room where you sleep, on no account. I'm
one of them sort of folks that always hates to
trouble a body. At that she began to haul the
dusty things about, to make up a bed on the kitchen
floor. I told her, any way she'd a mind to fix it,
if she'd only get quiet pretty soon, so we might get
a little rest afore daylight.
But where be I goin to sleep, mother? says her
great lubberly boy, that had been fetchin' up
housen-stuff
all the evening. I aint agoin' to sleep here
on the floor long with you and the gals I guess.
Well, Jimmy, says Miss Pinkham, I guess
Miss Downing will let you sleep in the bed-room
long with her two little boys. But you must mind
and not wake 'em up so as to be a trouble; I hate
to be a trouble to any body.
Polly looked as if she'd die; but she began to
be so afraid of Miss Pinkham after she took up the
chair to the Irishman, that if she'd asked for our
bed, I don't think but what she would agin it right
up to her, and slept on the floor ourselves. I thought
I wouldn't interfere about it, for I knew there would
be a fuss if I did, and I thought it was high time
we all of us had a little rest.
So Jimmy went off to bed, in the bed-room, and
Miss Pinkham and her two gals camped down on
the kitchen floor, and Polly and I clambered along
as well as we could over the heaps of housen-stuff
to our bed in the fore-room. Arter we'd laid about
an hour, and I begun to feel kind of drowsy, and
thought I should get a nap, I heard a rumpus in
the kitchen. And bimeby I heard Miss Pinkham
thumping away at the bed-room door, and calling
Jimmy. He didn't answer till she went clear in
and give him a shake, and says she,
Jimmy, you didn't bring that grid-iron and
poker, that stood in the cellar-way, now.
Yes, I did, says he, I brought it myself.
No you didn't, says she, for I haint seen
nothin
of it.
I did bring it, says he, and put it into a barrel
behind the door in the fore-room.
You sure? says she.
Yes I am sure; I remember.
I don't believe a word on't, says she, but I'll
know.
So, in she come, bolting into our room, and
fumbled
and clambered along in the dark, till she got
to the barrel behind the door, and felt in it, and
says she,
Well, I declare, 'tis here arter all. Jimmy has
an excellent memory.
In climbing back again, over the housen-stuff,
somehow or other she stumbled, headlong among
the bedsteads and barrels, and screamed out,
Oh dear, I've half broke my head; Miss
Downing
,
have you got any camfire?
There, ant Keziah, I've got to break right off
short again before I get through the story about
the movin, for the printer says he can't stand no
longer yarn to-day. But I'll sartinly give you the
upshot on't about movin day in my next.
So I remain your loving nephew,
Major Jack Downing
.
LETTER III.
To Aunt Keziah Downing
, wife of Uncle Joshua, of
Downingville
,
Maine.
New York
,
May
8, 1845.
THE UPSHOT OF THE STORY ABOUT MOVING.
Dear Aunt Keziah
,As I was a saying in my
last letter, Miss Pinkham tumbled headforemost
among the barrels and bedsteads, and heaps o'
things in our fore-room, and screamed out, Oh
dear, Miss Downing, have you got any camfire?
oh, I'm half killed.
At that, Polly sprung out of bed like a shot.
There's no body has more feelin' for a
fellow-creeter
than Polly has, tho' I say it myself; and
the way she runs when she sees anybody in
distress
is a caution, I can tell ye, to all the chairs and
barrels and bed-posts that stand in the way. Polly
was kind of half awake and half asleep: I don't
think she'd fairly got her eyes open, and if she had
it wouldn't a made much odds, for it was dark as
Egypt. And being waked all of a sudden right
out of a sound sleep, for she'd got to sleep, though
I hadn't, she'd forgot all about the trumpery that
was piled about the room, and startin' off the bed
like a stream of lightning, the first thing that brought
her up was a basket of Miss Pinkham's crockery
stuff. She pitched right over it and went
sprawling
on to the floor; and the tea-cups and the mugs
and the pitchers flew as if they'd been struck with
a thunder squall. At that, Miss Pinkham bawled
out again, and by the sound I knew she was up 'n
eend and climbled over the barrels; and says she,
Now, Miss Downing, what
have
you done? If
you've broke my new blue set, you'll wish you
hadn't I can tell ye.
Polly didn't make no answer, but only groaned;
and I knew in a minute she was hurt pretty bad;
so I thought it was time for me to begin to muster.
I got out of bed as careful as I could, and went
feelin' my way along into the kitchen, and at last I
found a loco-foco match and lit a candle.
Don't bring that light here, says Miss Pinkham
says she, 'till you hand me my gownd.
Says I, I don't know nothin' about your gownd,
nor I can't stop to look for't now. So I threw a
blanket to her, and told her she might rap herself
up in that. I found Polly wasn't hurt quite so bad
as I was afraid she was. She had bruised one of
her arms considerable, and struck the side of her
head pretty hard when she fell. But she soon
begun
to get over it, and said she guessed she wasn't
hurt much.
Miss Pinkham took on as bad as ever, and said
she should die if she didn't have some camfire to
put on her head; and she clim along over the things
and threw herself right on to our bed.
Poor creetur, says Polly, we must do
something
for her as quick as we can. Do, Jack, hand
me that bottle of camfire on the upper shelf in the
closet.
So I went and got the camfire and Polly sot to
and rubbed the old lady's head about a quarter of
an hour, and she got to sleep and lay and snored
like a hoss. I told Polly I guessed she better lay
down aside of her and try to get some sleep tu,
and I'd set up the rest of the night and be ready
airly in the morning to go to packing up. But
Polly said she was afraid of disturbin' of her, so
she laid down on the rugs in the kitchen to rest her
and get a little nap. I knew there wasn't no more
sleep for me that night; so arter Polly got to sleep
I concluded to go out and take a run; for I always
found that was the best way to keep my eyes open
when there wasn't no chance to sleep. The long
rows of lamps was still burning by the sides of the
streets, and I walked round and round from one
street to another, till it got to be daylight, and then
I turned to go home, for I meant to be driven
business
pretty airly.
When I got along within two or three streets of
home, there was a couple men turned the corner
right afore me, and I walked along arter 'em.
Pretty soon I saw one of 'em was that short, stout,
fat landlord that I see the night afore talking with
'Squire Sharp. And says he to the man that was
with him,
You've got your warrant, haint ye?
Yes, says the other, who I begun to think by
this time, was a constable or some kind of an
officer
,
for he carried a great, heavy cane in his hand,
and looked kind of savage-like.
Well, says the stout landlord, you must take
every single thing there is in the house, and hold
on to it, and if they don't settle the rent, we'll sell
'em at vendue to-morrow. Here's the house; now
do your duty. I'll stand here on the steps till you
get fairly in and take possession.
At that, thinks I, I'll stop a little and see what's
going on here. I stood over on t'other side of the
street, but it was so still I could hear all they said,
for it was so airly in the morning there wasn't but
very few folks a stirrin'. The officer stepped up
to the door and rung the bell. He waited a minute
and nobody didn't come, and then he rung again.
Nobody didn't come that time, and then he rung
again, harder than he did afore. Then the
landlord
stepped up to the door and thumped on to it
with his fist, and says he,
There's none so deaf as them that won't hear;
but they needn't think to work us in this way.
This door's got to come open by fair means or foul,
and I'll be the first person that goes through it, if I
have to stand here all day.
And then he thumped on to the door again with
his fist, and the officer rung the bell harder than
ever. And they kept at it pretty tight, first one
and then t'other, for about ten minutes, and they
made sich a racket that the neighbors begun to
open their blinds and window-shutters, and look
out to see what was the matter. And a little old
man poked his bald head out of the third story
window, right over where I stood, and says he,
What are ye making all that clatter over there
for? I don't believe you'll raise anybody if you
thump all day.
Why, aint Miss Pinkham and her family to
home? says the landlord.
Well, I don't believe there's a soul in the house,
said the little old manif there had been you'd
raised 'em long ago.
But they haven't moved, have they? says the
landlord.
It's a wonder to me if they haven't, said the
old man over my head, for they was to work till
almost midnight, last night, carrying out their
things.
At that the landlord and the officer looked kind
of thunderstruck.
Do you know where they've moved to? says
the officer.
I don't know nothing about it, said the little
old man, nor I don't care, if they wont come back
to our neighborhood again; for of all the women
to get into every's mess and upset everybody's dish,
Miss Pinkham beats all that ever I see.
And I don't see but she's dished us too, said
the officer. Well, Mr. Brown, what shall we do?
How shall we find out where she's gone to?
Oh, I can find that out easy enough, says Mr.
Brown, for she's took one of 'Squire Sharp's
houses. But we'll go in by hook or by crook;
may be she hasn't got all her things away yet.
So they went down to the basement doorthat
means a door that goes into a room about half way
between a cellar and a room above groundmost
all the houses here in New York have 'emand
they both give a shove against the door as tight as
they could, and bust it right open. And they went
in and looked all over the house, and come out
again looking sour enough. Mr. Brown used some
pretty harsh words, and swore a little.
That's always my luck, says he. Now she's
gone with two quarter's rent, and the house is
damaged
as much as another quarter's rent besides.
This is too bad; I had no idea but I should be
airly
enough to grab her furniture this morning.
Thinks I, Mr. Brown, getting up airly one
morning
in the year aint quite enough, where a man has
slippery folks to deal with, for sich folks commonly
want looking after every day, airly and late.
They turned and went away, and I turned tother
way and went home. It had now got to be all
broad daylight, and there begun to be
considerable
of a bustle in the streets, and the doors and
windows began to be opened, and the hoss-carts
began to rattle along over the stones in the streets,
and to back up to the doors, and folks was
lugging
out their housen-stuff and piling it on the carts,
as fast as we used to pitch hay in haying-time in
Downingville when there was a shower coming
up. So I thought it was time for me to begin to
hurry, for I hadn't got any of my things packed up
yet, though I meant to a had 'em pretty much all
packed up the night afore, if Miss Pinkham hadn't
bothered us so. When I got up stairs, I found the
whole biling of 'em was up, and in pretty
considerable
kind of a muss. Things was all pitch-poled,
helter-skelter, and mixed up as thick again as they
was when I went out. Polly sot in the corner,
looking as if she hadn't a friend in the world, and I
believe she was crying a little. Her arm was quite
lame. Miss Pinkham was stavin' about like a
house-a-fire. She'd pulled our children out of bed,
and they was scuddin' about half-dressed, and the
little ones was crying; and then she'd pulled and
hauled all our things out of the two bed rooms, and
piled 'em about in the fore-room and kitchen, so
that it was no small job to get across the rooms
anywhere; and she was fast a getting some of her
bedsteads and things into the bed-rooms to set up.
Says I, Miss Pinkham, what upon airth are
you doing?
What am I doing? says shewhy, I'm
putting
things to rights. I want to get 'em all out of
the way snug, so as not to be any trouble to you;
for I don't s'pose there anybody in this world that
hates to be a trouble to anybody in this world
worse than I do. And I wouldn't have you think,
because you let me bring my things in here before
it was my time to come in, that I mean to be the
least trouble to you in the world.
Oh, no, says I, Miss Pinkham, I don't think
no such thing, by no means. But perhaps if you'd
let my things stand till I got ready to pack 'em up,
I might know better where to take hold of 'em.
Oh no, says she, they're all out on the floor
there now as handy as can be for ye. And I've
got your closet all cleared out too; and now if
you'll jest take hold of t'other side of this ere
basket
of crockery, and help me carry it in the closet,
I'll be settin' it up.
So I took hold of the basket, and helped her along
with it, and says I
Miss Pinkham, I was very sorry about the
accident
that happened to your dishes last night. I
hope it didn't break much.
Only three cups and two sarcers and a mug,
says she, and Miss Downing's was so much like
em we've matched em again very well out of hern
this morning all but the mug, and that I told her
she might pay me the money for. It cost fifteen
pence when 'twas new, but bein it had an old crack
in it, I told her she needn't pay me but a shilling for
it.
The fact was, Polly had got so kind of nervous,
and so afraid of Miss Pinkham, that I dont believe
but what she would a gin her up every dish we
had in the house if she'd asked for em. I didn't
like this way of settling the business very well, and
couldn't help thinking about the hedge-hog that
begged
his way into the woodchuck's hole, only jest to
lay and rest him a little while, and then crowded
and crowded until he drove the woodchuck clear
out, and kept possession of the nest and all there
was in it. But I see Miss Pinkham was sich a fiery
piece, and as long as we had got to go out, I thought
the cheapest way was to say nothing and get away
as easily as we could. And it wasn't long before
I was still more confirmed in this opinion; for we
hadn't but jest set the basket of crockery into the
closet, when somebody knocked at the door.
Come in, says I. And who should come in,
but the fat landlord, Mr. Brown, and the officer
that I'd seen with him. Miss Pinkham's face
turned
as red as fire in a minute, and she shet the
closet door and took a chair and sot down.
You've moved, haven't you, Miss Pinkham?
said Mr. Brown, looking pretty starn at her.
Yes, I have, says she, looking as starn as he
did.
Well, when are you going to pay that rent?
says he, gritting his teeth together, and edging
along up to her.
When I get it, says she, sticking her chin out
at him, and showing her teeth, like a cat that turns
round to fight a dog that's drove her into a corner.
And I guess I shant worry myself about it, if
'taint paid very soon, says she, for you never
kept that house in any kind of repairs, Mr. Brown,
and you know it. 'Taint scarcely fit to live in.
Every thing was in good order when you went
into it, says he, and all the rent you've ever paid,
I've laid out in repairs; and now it wants fifty
dollars
more laid out right upon it before it will be fit
for any body to go into. There isn't a window in
the house but what's got glass broke out of it.'
Well, I don't know nothing about how that
come, says she,
we
didn't break none of it.
Well, says he, I must have this rent or some
security for it, before I leave the house, or I shall
take some of your furniture and sell it for what
t'will fetch. You've got lots of it piled about here.
At that Miss Pinkham begun to rave. She
sprung up on her feet, and stood and looked Mr.
Brown in the face, and she grew as red as a blaze.
And says she.
You touch any of this furniture if you dare.
And these things about here aint mine neither,
they're Mr. Downing's.
At that Mr. Brown turned to me, and says he,
Mr. Downing, is this furniture yourn?
I wasn't no notion of telling a lie for any of 'em.
So, says I, Some on't 's mine, and some on't isn't.
Well, says he, which is yourn, and which is
Miss Pinkham's.
Says I, `She's got matters so mixed up here,
'twould take pretty considerable of a spell to pick
em out I guess. But most of these things about the
middle of the room is mine, and most of them are
things heaped along that side of the fore-room and
that side of the kitchen is hern.
Then he stepped along, and began to look em over,
and told the officer to take this thing and that thing
and 'tother thing. But Miss Pinkham ketched up
a chair and went at him like a tiger, and says she,
Mr. Brown, if you aint out of this house in one
minute, I'll break this chair over your head. And
she fetched a blow at him, that, if he hadn't a
dodged it, would a laid him sprawlin. He sprung
for the door, and she after him pell-mell. He
scrabbled down stairs as fast as he could waddle
his heavy fat sides along, and she arter him,
holding
the chair up jest ready to strike. When they
got about half-way down stairs, she happened to
slip, and pitched forward against Mr. Brown, and
that knocked him down, and away they rolled like
a couple of hogsets of molasses clear to the bottom
of the stairs. Mr. Brown was rather more scared
than hurt, for he thought the old woman had
jumped right on to him and knocked him down stairs,
and he roared out and called for the officer to come
and help him. But the officer was making his way
as fast as he could down the back stairs, and got
out into the street before Mr. Brown did. I looked
out of the window, and I see em both jest turning
round the next corner, and Mr. Brown was limping
along so lame, he couldn't but jest go. Presently
Miss Pinkham came puffing along up the stairs,
and muttering to herself, I'll larn him to come here
to meddle with my things; a good-for-nothing
brute; I'll larn him, I will. And says she, Mr.
Downing, I broke your chair driving of him out, but
I spose you won't mind that, as I did it as much
for your good as for mine; for there's no knowing
how many of your things he might a carried off if
I hadn't a drove him out.
I told her it wan't but little consequence about
the chair, especially as she had some pretty much
like it, and when we come to load up, she could jest
put in one of hern, and that would make it square
again. At that she turned round and give me such
a look right in the face, that I declare I started back
as much as three feet before I knew it; and says
she,
Mr. Downing, if you haint no more gratitude
than that, you aint fit to live among Christian
people. Do as you would be done by; that's my
rule. After I've drove that brute out of your
house, and no doubt kept him from carrying off
some of your things, do you dare to ask me to pay
for that old chair?and she stuck her chin out
and flashed her eyes jest as she did to Mr. Brown.
Oh no, mam, says I, I don't wish it by no
means, Miss Pinkham.
So we dropt the subject and said no more about
it. If it had been a man I should a known what
to a done pretty quick; for I never was made to
be drove by a man. But I thought I wouldn't get
into a scrape with a woman if she broke all the
chairs in the house. So at it I went to packin up.
Polly and Cousin Nabby took hold in good arnest,
and Jacky and Ichabod handed and fetched things,
so that we got 'em into shape pretty fast. About
nine o'clock we'd got our boxes and barrels and
chests full, and the small ware and dishes put
into the wash-tubs and pots and kettles, and I went
out to find a team to haul us. I could find teams
fast enough, but the trouble was to get 'em. There
wasn't no ox teams sich as we have in
Downingville
;
but there was no end to the one hoss teams,
haulin little carts, and goin like split all over the
city. I run arter one that I see a little ways off
with nothin on his cart, and called out to him to
stop. He looked round to me and shook his head,
and drove on as tight as ever. But I pulled arter
him and hollered again, and swung my hat, and at
last he stopt and let me come up to him. Says I,
Mister, I want to hire you to go and haul up
my housen-stuff, if you and I can agree.
He put his thumb up against his nose, and shook
his fingers at me, and says he,
You must be a green one, and no mistake.
And he gin his hoss a cut, and his wheels flew over
the stones again as fast, and made as much of a
rattlin, as cousin John Smith's drumsticks when
he's beatin for the regiment muster days.
Then I see another drivin along full chisel, but his
cart was empty, so I hollered arter him. He
slackened
his hoss a minute, and when I told him what I
wanted, he said he couldn't go no how, for he'd got
fourteen loads engaged to-day, and that was as
much as he could possibly get through with, and
work half the night too. So he whipped up, and
off he went like smoke. I called arter another, and
he only shook his head and drove on. I run round
from one street to another for about an hour, and
my stars! I wouldn't a believed there was so much
housen-stuff in America. Every street was full of
loaded carts and empty carts. All the empty ones
was driving like Jehu, and some of the loaded ones
was goin so fast I thought they'd smash every
thing all to atoms, except now and then one, where
the owner of the housen-stuff was going along with it
to watch it. At last, after trying a good many of 'em,
I found one that said he didn't know but he might go.
Well, says I, Mister, what'll ye ask?
Two dollars and a half a load, says he.
But that's a most unreasonable price, says I.
Can't help that, says he, nobody don't take
any less to-day. And some of 'em gets three or
four dollars a load. Come, speak quick, if you
want me, says he, for I can't wait.
Well, now, says I, Mister, that price is beyond
all reason. Couldn't you and I work it so as to
change works? I'm sure I should be willing to do
you as good a turn as you would me. If you'll go
and work for me half a day with yourself and
hoss, I'll work for you a whole day, and take my
Jacky with me, and he's a smart boy most fourteen
years old.
At that, I'll be hanged if he didn't put his thumb
up agin his nose, jest as that teamster did that I
stopt first; it seems to be a kind of a way they
have here when they want to be very sassy; and
says he,
Rather green, I guess; when d'ye come down?
and he gin his hoss a cut and along he went.
Arter a while I found an old man with a lean old
hoss, that had sort of gridiron ribs, and he said he'd
go for two dollars a load. I found I was getting
into a corner, for it had got to be eleven o'clock,
and I'd seen enough of Miss Pinkham to expect
she'd begin to
reign
as soon as the clock struck
twelve. So I told the old man he might go; and
we drove home and went to loading. We laid the
bedsteads on lengthways, and then the buro on
crossways and back down, and next to that come
a chist of clothes, and then two tables bottom
upwards
,
and then two flour barrels full of little
things on behind, and a light stand between 'em
bottom upwards. And then we filled in a laying
of little things all the way from one end to 'tother;
and then we laid on the feather bed that you give
Polly when we came away from Downingville;
and then we put on some baskets, the tubs of dishes
and things, and rounded off towards the top with
bed-clothes, and light truck and then we hung a
row of chairs all round on the stakes. By running
a rope round the stakes and binding up pretty well,
the cart took on more than I expected, and I begun
to be in hopes we might carry it all to one load.
The old man said he could carry it all well enough,
if I'd mind to resk it's staying on. So we went
to piling on again, and chucking in and filling up
all the holes between things. Some of the top
things was rather loose and tottlish, so we put Jacky
right up top and let him set straddle of the
load to steady it. And then we had to give him a
basket full of tumblers and glass things to hold in
his hand. Cousin Nabby took little Joshy, and
Polly took the looking glass, and I took the military
coat that Gineral Jackson give me when I lived to
Washington, and hung it across my arm, for I never
allow that coat to be jammed away into a chist or
buro; and uncle Joshua's portrait, that I've had put
into a nice brass frame since we've been here, I
took in t'other hand. Then I told the old man he
might start along, and we'd walk behind and keep
watch. I felt a little anxious about Jacky on top
of the load; but he's a smart boy, and he hung on
and managed things pretty well. But sich a sight of
teams and folks as there was all along the streets,
carryin all sorts of housen-stuff, I don't think you
ever see or dreampt of. The streets was full of
carts goin' and comin, and the side-walks was full
of men, women and children carrying things in
their hands.
When we had got about half way, the cart had
got along a little ways a head of us, and I was
looking
back at the crowd behind us, when all to once
Polly screamed out there goes Jacky.
I looked, and Jacky was flying in the air like a
toad from a trap-stick. One of them great hoss
wagons they call omnibusses here, had run full tilt
right against the cart, and knocked every thing into
a kind of a cocked hat. It didn't exactly upset the
cart, but it knocked off about one half the top-load,
and sent Jacky clear from the middle of the street on
to the side walk. The omnibus fellow drove on as
fast as he could drive, and never stopt to look back.
I was afraid Jacky was almost killed, and I run as
hard as I could to pick him up; but he struck
pretty much on his feet, and wasn't hurt much arter
all. He held on to the basket, but the glass was
smashed all to pieces. When Polly came up she
couldn't help cryin. But I told her it was no use to
cry for spilt milk. Jacky was saved alive, and
therefore we had a great deal more to be thankful
for than we had to cry for. As for the glass dishes
and things we could soon go to work and earn some
more, and the best way was to pick up the things
and get 'em home as well as we could and make the
the best of it. So Polly wiped up, and we all went
to work to put things to rights as well as we
could. A good many of the things was broke, and
some was jammed and twisted out of all shape. We
had to pile 'em up on the side walk, and Polly
and Nabby stay by 'em and watch 'em, while we
went along to the house and onloaded what there
was left on the cart; and then we went back and
picked up the fragments, and about sunset we got
'em all tumbled into the house in heaps, and never
was I so glad to get through with a job afore in all
my life. We made up some beds on the floor that
night, and
if we didn't sleep
I think it's a pity.
I would tell you a great many queer things, how
the great rich folks moved, and how the poor folks
moved, and about landlords nabbing housen-stuff
and selling it at vendue, and about some poor
creeters
bein turned out of doors, and no house to put
their heads into, and setting and crying all day and
all night out on the side walk. Polly's cried about
it a half a dozen times since, she pitied 'em so.
But I haint got time to write no more to-day. I
hope you and uncle Joshua will come and make us
a visit this summer, and then we can tell you all
about it. But there's no day in this world, aunt
Keziah, like May-day in New York, you may
depend
on't. Give my love to Uncle Joshua, and I
remain,
Your loving nephew,
Major Jack Downing
.
SKETCHES FROM LIFE.
[
Note by the Publishers
. The following stories and sketches
of humor are inserted at the special request of Major Downing, and by
consent of the author.]
The names used in the following narrative are of course
fictitious; but the incidents all occurred substantially as here
related, and the parties are respectable gentlemen now living
and doing business in this bustling city of New York. The
writer had the account directly from the lips of the principal
actor. It also should be added that Mr. Sharp described in
this article is not Squire Sharp, the landlord, mentioned by
Major Downing in his May-day letters, though it is not
improbable
he may be a second or third cousin.]
PERSEVERANCE:
OR PETER PUNCTUAL'S WAY TO COLLECT BILLS.
BY SEBA SMITH.
Some few years ago, Peter Punctual, an honest
and industrious young fellow from Yankee landI
say Yankee land, but I freely confess that is merely
an inference of mine, drawn from circumstances of
this story itself; but if my readers, after perusing
it, do not come to the same conclusion, they may
set him down as coming from any other land they
please; but for myself, were I on a jury, and under
oath, I would bring him in a Yankee. This same
Peter Punctual, some few years ago, came into
New York, and attempted to turn a penny and get
an honest living by procuring subscribers to
various
magazines and periodicals, on his own hook.
That is, he would receive a quantity of magazines
from a distant publisher, at a discount, and get up
his own list of subscribers about the city, and serve
them through the year at the regular subscription
price, which would leave the amount of the said
discount a clear profit in his pocket, or rather a
compensation for his time and labor. There are
many persons in this city who obtain a livelihood in
the same way.
Peter's commissions being small, and his capital
still smaller, he was obliged to transact his business
with great care and circumspection, in order to
make both ends meet. He adopted a rule therefore
to make all his subscribers pay their year's
subscription
in advance. Such things could be done
in those days when business was brisk, and the
people
were strangers to hard times. In canvassing
for subscribers, one day, through the lower part of
the city, and in the principal business streets, he
observed
a store which had the air of doing a heavy
business, and read upon the sign over the door,
Solomon Sharp, Importer of certain wares and
merchandize. The field looked inviting, and in
Peter went with his samples under his arm, and
inquired
for Mr. Sharp. The gentleman was
pointed
out to him by the clerks, and Peter stepped up
and asked him if he would not like to subscribe for
some magazines.
What sort of ones have you got there? said
Mr. S.
Three or four different kinds, said Peter, laying
the specimens on the desk before himplease to
look at them and suit yourself.
Sharp tumbled them over and examined them
one after another, and at last took up
Buckingham's
New England Magazine, published at
Boston
.
4
What are your terms for this? said he; I
don't know but I would subscribe for this.
Five dollars a year in advance, said Peter, to
be delivered carefully every month at your store or
house.
But I never pay in advance for these things,
said Sharp. It's time enough to pay for a thing
when you get it. I'll subscribe for it, if you have a
mind to receive your pay at the end of the year,
and not otherwise.
That's against my rule, said Peter; I have
all my subscribers pay in advance.
Well, it's against my rule to pay for anything
before I get it, said Sharp; so if you haven't a
mind to take my subscription, to be paid at the end
of the year, you won't get it at all. That's the long
and the short of the matter.
Peter paused a little, and queried with himself as
to what he had better do. The man was
evidently
doing a large business, and was undoubtedly
richa wholesale dealer and an importerthere
could not possibly be any danger of losing the
subscription
in such a case: and would it not be
better
to break over his rule for once, than to lose so
good a subscriber.
Well, what say? said Sharp; do as you
like; but those are my only terms. I will not pay
for a thing before I get it.
On the whole, said Peter, I have a good mind
to break over my rule this time, for I don't like to
lose a good subscriber when I can find one. I
believe
I'll put your name down, sir. Where will
you have it left?
At my house, said Mr. Sharp, which was
about a mile and a half from his store, away up
town.
The business being thus concluded, Peter took
up his magazines, bade Mr. Sharp good morning,
and left the store. No further personal intercourse
occurred between them during the year. But
Peter
,
who was his own carrier, as well as canvasser,
regularly every month delivered the New England
Magazine at Mr. Sharp's door. And in a few days
after the year expired, he made out his bill for the
five dollars, and called at Mr. Sharp's store for the
money. He entered with as much confidence that
he should receive the chink at once, as he would
have had in going with a check for the like sum
into
the Bank of the United States, during that
institution's
palmiest days. He found Mr. Sharp at his
desk, and presented him the bill. That gentleman
took it and looked at it, and then looked at Peter.
Oh! ah, good morning, said he, you are the
young man who called here on this business nearly
a year ago. Well, the year has come round, has
it?
Yes, I believe it has, said Peter.
Well, bills of this kind, said Mr. Sharp, are
paid at the house. We don't attend to them here;
you just take it to the house, any time when you are
passing, and it will be settled.
Oh, very well, sir, said Peter, bowing, and left
the store. Doing too large a business at the store,
I suppose, he continued, to himself, as he walked
up the street, to attend to little things of this kind.
Don't like to be bothered with 'em, probably.
But Peter thought he might as well make a finish
of the business, now he was out; so he went
directly
to the house, and rung at the door. The
servant girl soon made her appearance.
Mrs. Sharp within? said Peter.
Yes, sir, said the girl.
Jest carry this bill to her, if you please, and ask
her if she will hand you the money for it.
The girl took the bill into the house, and
presently
returned with the answer, that Mrs. Sharp says
she doesn't pay none of these 'ere things hereyou
must carry it to the store.
Please to carry it back to Mrs. Sharp, said
Peter, and tell her Mr. Sharp desired me to bring
the bill here, and said it would be paid at the
house.
This message brought Mrs. Sharp herself to the
door, to whom Peter raised his hat and bowed very
politely.
I haven't nothing at all to do with the bills here
at the house, said the lady; they must be
carried
to the storethat's the place to attend to them.
Well, mam, said Peter, I carried it to the
store, and presented it to Mr. Sharp, and he told
me to bring it to the house and you would pay it
here, and that he couldn't attend to it at the store.
But he couldn't mean that I should pay it, said
Mrs. Sharp, for he knows I haven't the money.
But he said so, said Peter.
Well then there must be some mistake about
it, said the lady.
I beg your pardon, mam, said Peter, it's
possible
there may be, and he put the bill in his
pocket
,
bowed and left the house.
It is very queer, thought Peter to himself as
he walk away a little vexed. I can't conceive
how there could be any mistake about it, though it
is possible there may be. There couldn't be any
mistake on my part, for I'm sure I understood him.
May be he thought she had money at the house
when she hadn't. I guess it will all come out right
enough in the end.
Consoling himself with these reflections, Peter
Punctual thought he would let Mr. Sharp rest two
or three days, and not show any anxiety by calling
again in a hurry. He would not be so unwise as
to offend a good subscriber, and run the hazard of
losing him, by an appearance of too much haste in
presenting his bills. Accordingly, in about three
days, he called again at Mr. Sharp's store, and
asked
him in a low voice, so that no one should
overhear
,
if it was convenient for him to take that little
bill for the magazine to-day.
But I told you, said Mr. Sharp, to carry that
bill to the house; I can't attend to it here.
Yes, sir, so I understood you, said Peter, and
I carried it to the house, and Mrs. Sharp said she
couldn't pay it there, for she had no money, and I
must bring it to the store.
Oh, strange, said Mr. Sharp; well, she didn't
properly understand it then. But I am too much
engaged to attend to you to-day; you call again, or
call at the house sometime, when I am there.
Upon this, he turned to his desk and began to
write with great earnestness, and Peter left the
store. The affair began to grow a little vexatious,
and Peter felt a little nettled. Still, he supposed
that people doing such very large business
did
find
it difficult to attend to these little matters, and
doubtless it would be set right when he should call
again.
After waiting patiently a couple of weeks, Peter
called again at Mr. Sharp's store. When he
entered
the door, Mr. Sharp was looking at a
newspaper
;
but on glancing at Peter, he instantly dropped
the paper, and fell to writing at his desk with great
rapidity. Peter waited respectfully a few minutes,
unwilling to disturb the gentleman till he should
appear
to be a little more at leisure. But after
waiting
some time without seeing any prospect of Mr.
Sharp's completing the very pressing business
before
him, he approached him with deference, and
asked if it would be convenient for him to take that
little bill for the magazine to-day. Sharp turned
and looked at Peter very sternly.
I can't be bothered with these little things, said
he, when I am so much engaged. I am
exceedingly
busy to-daya good many heavy orders
waitingyou must call at the house, and hand the
bill to me or my wife, no matter which. And he
turned to his desk, and continued to write, without
saying anything more.
Peter began to think he had got hold of a hard
customer: but he had no idea of giving up the
chase. He called at the house several times
afterward
,
but Mr. Sharp never happened to be at home.
Once he ventured to send the bill again by the girl
to Mrs. Sharp, who returned for answer, that she
had nothing to do with such bills; he must carry it
to the store.
At last, after repeated calls, he found Mr. Sharp
one day at home. He came to the door, and Peter
presented the bill. Mr. Sharp expressed some
surprize
and regret that he had come away from the
store, and forgot to put any money in his pocket.
Peter would have to call some other day.
Accordingly
,
Peter Punctual retired, with a full
determination
to call some other day, and that not very far
distant; for it had now been several months that
he had been beaten back and forth like a
shuttlecock
between Mr. Sharp's store and Mr. Sharp's
house, and he was getting to be rather tired of the
game.
Having ascertained from the girl at what hour
the family dined, he called the next day precisely
at the dinner hour. He rung at the door, and when
the girl opened it, Peter stepped into the hall.
Is Mr. Sharp in? said Peter.
Yes, sir, said the girl; he's up stairs. I'll
speak to him if you want to see him.
Yes, said Peter, and I'll take a seat in the
parlor till he comes down.
As he said this, Peter walked into the parlor and
seated himself upon an elegant sofa. The parlor
was richly furnished with Brussels carpet, the best
of mahogany furniture, a splendid piano, &c., &c.;
and in the back parlor, to which folding doors were
open, everything appeared with corresponding
elegance
.
A table was there spread, upon which
dinner
seemed to be nearly ready. Presently the girl
returned from the chamber, and informed Peter,
that Mr. Sharp said it was jest the dinner hour
now, and he would have to call again.
Please to go and tell Mr. Sharp, said Peter,
that I must see him, and I'll wait till he comes
down.
The girl carried the message, and Mr. Sharp
soon made his appearance in the parlor. A frown
passed over his brow as he looked at Peter and
saw him sitting so much at ease, and apparently so
much at home, upon the sofa. Peter rose and
asked
him politely if it was convenient for him to take
that little bill to-day.
No, said Sharp, it is not; and if it was, I
wouldn't take it at this hour. It's a very improper
time to call upon such an errand just as one is
going
to sit down to dinner. You must call again;
but don't call at dinner time; or you may drop
into
the store sometime, and perhaps I may find time
to attend to it there.
Well, now, Mr. Sharp, said Peter, with rather
a determined look, I can't stand this kind of
business
any longer, that's a fact. I'm a poor man, and
I suppose you are a rich one. I can't afford to lose
five dollars, and I'm too poor to spend any more
time in running after it and trying to collect it. I
must cat, as well as other folks, and if you can't pay
me the five dollars to-day, to help me pay my board
at my regular boarding-house, I'll stay here and
board it out at your table.
You will, will you? said Sharp, looking dag
gers, and stepping toward Peter. If you give me
a word of your impudence, you may find it'll be a
long time before you collect your bill.
It's been a long time already, said Peter, and
I can't afford to wait any longer. My mind is made
up; if you don't pay me now, I'm going to stay
here and board it out.
Sharp colored, and looked at the door, and then
at Peter.
Come, come, young man, said he, advancing
with rather a threatening attitude toward Peter,
the sooner you leave the house peaceably the
better
.
Now, sir, said Peter, fixing his black eyes
upon
Sharp, with an intenseness that he could not but
feel, I am a small man, and you are considerable
of a large one; but my mind is made up. I am
not going to starve, when there's food enough that
I have an honest claim upon.
So saying, he took his seat again very
deliberately
upon the sofa. Sharp paused; he looked
agitated
and angry; and after waiting a minute,
apparently
undecided what to do, he left the parlor
and went up stairs. In a few minutes, the servant
rung for dinner. Mrs. Sharp came into the dining
room and took her seat at the head of the table.
Mr. Sharp followed, and seated himself opposite his
lady; and between them, and on the right hand of
of Mrs. Sharp, sat another lady, probably some
friend or relative of the family. When they were
well seated, and Mr. Sharp was beginning to carve,
Peter walked out of the parlor, drew another chair
up to the table, and seated himself very
composedly
opposite the last mentioned lady. Mr. Sharp
colored a good deal, but kept on carving. Mrs.
Sharp stared very wildly, first at Peter and then at
her husband.
What in the world does this mean? said she.
Mr. Sharp I didn't know we were to have
company
to dinner.
We are not, said the husband. This young
man has the impudence to take his seat at the table
unasked and says he is going to board out the
amount of the bill.
Well, really, this is a pretty piece of politeness,
said Mrs. Sharp, looking very hard at Peter.
Madam, said Peter, hunger will drive a man
through a stone wall. I must have my board
somewhere
.
No reply was made to this, and the dinner went
on without any further reference to Peter at
present
.
Mr. Sharp helped his wife, and then the
other
lady, and then himself, and they all fell to eating.
Peter looked around him for a plate and knife and
fork, but there wre none on the table but what
were in use. Peter, however, was not to be
baffled
.
He reached a plate of bread, and tipping the
bread upon the table cloth, appropriated the plate
for his own convenience. He then took possession
of the carving knife and fork, helped himself
bountifully
to meat and vegetables, and commenced
eating
his dinner with the greatest composure
imaginable
.
These operations on the part of Peter, had
the effect to suspend all operations for the time on
the part of the rest of the company. The ladies
had laid down their knives and forks, and were
staring at Peter in wild astonishment.
For mercy's sake, Mr. Sharp, said the lady of
the house, can't we pick up money enough about
the house to pay this man his five dollars and send
him off? I declare this is too provoking. I'll see
what I can find.
With that she rose and left the room. Mr. Sharp
presently followed her. They returned again in a
minute, and Mr. Sharp laid a five dollar bill before
Peter, and told him he would thank him to leave
the house. Peter examined the bill to see if it was
a good one, and very quietly folded it and put it
into
his pocket. He then drew out a little pocket
inkstand
and a piece of paper, laid it upon the table
before him, wrote a receipt for the money, which
he handed to Mr. Sharp, rose from the table,
bowed
to the company and retired, thinking as he left
the house that he had had full enough of the custom
of Solomon Sharp, the importer.
Peter Punctual still followed his vocation of
circulating
magazines. He had no intention of ever
darkening the door of Mr. Solomon Sharp's store
again, but somehow or other, two or three years
after, as he was canvasing for subscribers in the
lower part of the city, he happened to blunder into
the same store accidentally, without noticing the
name upon the door. Nor did he discover his
mistake
,
until he had nearly crossed the store and
attracted
the attention of Mr. Sharp himself, who was
at his accustomed seat at the desk where Peter had
before so often seen him. Peter thought, as he
had got fairly into the store, he would not back out;
so he stepped up to Mr. Sharp without a look of
recognition
,
and asked if he would not like to
subscribe
for some magazines. Mr. Sharp, who either
did not recognize Peter, or chose not to appear to
recognize him, took the magazines and looked at
them, and found a couple he said he would like to
take, and inquired the terms. They were each
three dollars a year in advance.
But I don't pay in advance for anything, said
Sharp. If you have a mind to leave them at my
house, to be paid for at the end of the year, you
may put me down for these two.
No, said Peter, I don't wish to take any
subscribers
,
but those who pay in advance.
Saying this, he took up his specimens, and was
going out of the door, when Mr. Sharp called him
back.
Here young man, you may leave those two at
any rate, said he, and here's your advance,
handing him the six dollars.
Where will you have them left? said Peter.
At my house, up town, said Mr. Sharp,
describing
the street and number.
The business being completed, Peter retired,
much astonished at his good luck. He again
became
a monthly visitor at Mr. Sharp's door, where
he regularly delivered to the servant girl the two
magazines. Two or three months after this, when
he called one day on his usual round, the girl told
him that Mr. Sharp wanted to see him, and desired
he would call at the store. Peter felt not a little
curious to know what Mr. Sharp might have to
say to him; so in the course of the same day he
called at Mr. Sharp's store.
Good morning, said Mr. Sharp as Peter
entered
;
come, take a chair, and sit down here.
Peter, with a good morning, sir, did as he was
desired.
Ain't you the young man, said Mr. Sharp, with
a comical kind of a look, who set out to board
out a subscription to the New England Magazine,
at my house two or three years ago.
Yes, said Peter, I believe I'm the same
person
who once had the honor of taking board at your
house.
Well, said Mr. Sharp, I want to give you a
job.
What is it? said Peter.
Here, I want you to collect these bills for me,
said Mr. Sharp, taking a bundle from his desk, for
I'll be hanged if
I
can; I've tried till I'm tired.
Whereupon he opened the bundle and assorted
out the bills, and made a schedule of them,
amounting
,
in the aggregate, to about a thousand dollars.
There, said he, I will give upon that list ten
per cent commission on all you collect; and on
that list I'll give you twenty-five per cent on all
you collect. What say you? will you undertake
the job?
Well, I'll try, said Peter, and see what I can
do with them. How soon must I return them?
Take your own time for it, said Mr. Sharp;
I've seen enough of you to know pretty well what
you are.
Peter accordingly took the bills and entered on
his new task, following it up with diligence and
perseverance
.
In a few weeks he called again at
Sharp's store.
Well, said Mr. Sharp, have you made out
to collect anything on those bills?
Yes, said Peter.
There were some of the ten per cent list that I
thought it probable you might collect, said Mr.
Sharp. How many have you collected?
All of them, said Peter.
All of them! said Sharp; well, fact, that's
much more than I expected. The twenty-five per
cent list was all dead dogs, wasn't it? You got
nothing on them, I suppose, did you?
Yes, I did, said Peter.
Did you though? How much? said Sharp.
I got them all, said Peter.
Oh, that's all a joke, said Sharp.
No, it isn't a joke, said Peter. I've collected
every dollar of them, and here's the money, taking
out his pocket-book, and counting out the bills.
Mr. Sharp received the money with the most
perfect astonishment. He had not expected one
half of the amount would ever be collected.
He counted out the commissions on the ten per
cent list, and then the commissions on the
twenty-five
per cent list, and handed the sum over to
Peter
.
And then he counted out fifty dollars more,
and asked Peter to accept that as a present;
partly
,
said he, because you have accomplished this
task so very far beyond my expectations, and
partly
because my acquaintance with you has taught
me one of the best lessons of my life. It has taught
me the value of perseverance and punctuality. I
have reflected upon it much ever since you
undertook
to board out the bill for the magazine at my
house.
Why yes, said Peter, I think perseverance
and punctuality are great helps in the way of
business
.
If every person in the community, said Mr.
Sharp, would make it a point to pay all of his bills
promptly, the moment they become due, what a
vast improvement it would make in the condition
of society all round. That would put people in a
condition, at all times, to be
able
to pay their bills
promptly.
We might add, that Peter Punctual afterward
opened a store in the city, in a branch of business
which brought Mr. Sharp to be a customer to him,
and he has been one of his best customers ever
since, paying all of his bills promptly, and whenever
Peter requires it, even paying in advance.
POLLY GRAY AND THE DOCTORS.
BY SEBA SMITH.
It
was a dark, and rainy night in June, when
Deacon Gray, about ten o'clock in the evening,
drove his horse and wagon up to the door, on his
return
from market.
Oh dear, Mr. Gray, exclaimed his wife, as she
met him at the door, I'm dreadful glad you've
come; Polly's so sick, I'm afraid she won't live till
mornin', if something ain't done for her.
Polly is always ailing, said the deacon
deliberately
;
I guess it's only some of her old aches
and pains. Just take this box of sugar in; it has
been raining on it this hour.
Well, do come right in, Mr. Gray, for you don't
know what a desput case she is in; I daren't leave
her a minute.
You are always scared half to death, said the
deacon, if anything ails Polly; but you know she
always gets over it again. Here's coffee and tea
and some other notions rolled up in this bag,
handing
her another bundle to carry into the house.
Well, but Mr. Gray, don't pray stop for bundles
nor nothin' else. You must go right over after
Doctor Longley, and get him here as quick as you
can.
Oh, if it's only Doctor Longley she wants, said
the deacon carelessly, I guess she aint so
dangerous
after all.
Now, Mr. Gray, jest because Doctor Longley is
a young man and about Polly's age, that you should
make such an unfeelin' expression as that, I think is
too bad.
The deacon turned away without making a
reply
,
and began to move the harness from the horse.
Mr. Gray, ain't you going after the doctor?
said Mrs. Gray, with increasing impatience.
I'm going to turn the horse into the pasture,
and then I'll come in and see about it, said the
deacon.
A loud groan from Polly drew Mrs. Gray hastily
into the house. The deacon led his horse a
quarter
of a mile to the pasture; let down the bars and
turned him in; put all the bars carefully up;
hunted
round and found a stick to drive in as a wedge
to fasten the top bar; went round the barn to see
that the doors were all closed; got an armful of
dry straw and threw it into the pig-pen; called the
dog from his kennel, patted him on his head, and
went into the house.
I'm afraid she's dying, said Mrs. Gray, as the
deacon entered.
You are always scared half out of your wits,
said the deacon, if there's anything the matter.
I'll come in as soon as I've took off my coat and
boots and put on some dry ones.
Mrs. Gray ran back to attend upon Polly; but
before the deacon had got ready to enter the room,
Mrs. Gray screamed again with the whole strength
of her lungs,
Mr. Gray, Mr. Gray, do make haste, she's in a fit.
This was the first sound that had given the
deacon
any uneasiness about the matter. He had been
accustomed for years to hear his wife worry
about Polly, and had heard her predict her death so
often from very slight illness, that he had come to
regard such scenes and such predictions with as
little attention as he did the rain that pattered
against the window. But the word
fit
was
something
he had never heard applied in these cases
before, and the sound of it gave him a strange
feeling
of apprehension. He had just thrown off his
boots and put his feet into dry shoes, and held a
dry coat in his hand, when this last appeal came to
his ear and caused him actually to hasten into the
room.
Polly, what's the matter now? said the
deacon
,
beginning to be somewhat agitated, as he
approached
the bedside.
Polly was in violent spasms, and heeded not the
inquiry. The deacon took hold of her arm, and
repeated the question more earnestly and in a
tender
tone.
You may as well speak to the dead, said Mrs.
Gray; she's past hearing or speaking.
The deacon's eyes looked wild, and his face
grew very long.
Why didn't you tell me how sick she was
when I first got home? said the deacon, with a
look of rebuke.
I did tell you when you first come, said Mrs.
Gray, sharply, and you didn't take no notice on
it.
You didn't tell me anything about how sick she
was, said the deacon; you only spoke jest as you
used to, when she wasn't hardly sick at all.
The subject here seemed to subside by mutual
consent, and both stood with their eyes fixed upon
Polly, who was apparently struggling in the fierce
agonies of death. In a few minutes however, she
came out of the spasm, breathed comparatively
easy, and lay perfectly quiet. The deacon spoke
to her again. She looked up with a wild delirious
look, but made no answer.
I'll go for the doctor, said the deacon, it
may be he can do something for her, though she
looks to me as though it was a gone goose with
her.
Saying this, he put on his hat and coat and
started
.
Having half a mile to go, and finding the doctor
in bed, it was half an hour before he returned with
Doctor Longley in his company. In the meantime
Mrs. Gray had called in old Mrs. Livermore who
lived next door, and they had lifted Polly up
and put a clean pillow upon the bed, and a clean
cap on her head, and had been round and slicked
up the room a little, for Mrs. Livermore said,
Doctor Longley was such a nice man she always
loved to see things look tidy where he was coming
to.
The deacon came in and hung his hat up behind
the door, and Doctor Longley followed with his hat
in his hand and a small pair of saddle-bags on his
arm. Mrs. Gray stood at one side of the bed, and
Mrs. Livermore at the other, and the doctor laid
his hat and saddle-bags on the table that stood by
the window, and stepped immediately to the
bed-side
.
Miss Gray, are you sick? said the doctor,
taking the hand of the patient.
No answer or look from the patient gave any
indication that she heard the question.
How long has she been ill? said the doctor.
Ever since mornin', said Mrs. Gray. She
got up with a head-ache, jest after her father went
away to market, and smart pains inside, and she's
been growing worse all day.
And what have you given her? said the doctor.
Nothing, but arb-drink, said Mrs. Gray;
whenever she felt worse, I made her take a good
deal of arb-drink, because that, you know, is always
good, doctor. And besides, when it can't do no
good, it would do no hurt.
But what sort of drinks have you given her?
said the doctor.
Well, I give her most all sorts, for we had a
plenty of 'em in the house, said Mrs. Gray. I
give her sage, and peppermint, and sparemint, and
cammermile, and pennyryal, and motherwort, and
balm; you know, balm is very coolin,' doctor, and
sometimes she'd be very hot, and then I'd make her
drink a good dose of balm.
Give me a candle, said the doctor.
The deacon brought a candle and held it over
the patient's head. The doctor opened her mouth
and examined it carefully for the space of a minute.
He felt her pulse another minute, and looked again
into her mouth.
Low pulse, but heavy and labored respiration,
said the doctor.
What do you think ails her? said Mrs. Gray.
The doctor shook his head.
Do you think you can give her anything to
help her? said the deacon anxiously.
The doctor looked very grave, and fixed his eyes
thoughtfully on the patient for a minute, but made
no reply to the deacon's question.
Why didn't you send for me sooner? at last
said the doctor, turning to Mrs. Gray.
Because I thought my arb-drink would help her,
and so I kept trying it all day till it got to be dark,
and then she got be so bad I didn't dare to leave
her till Mr. Gray got home.
It's a great pity, said the doctor, turning from
the bed to the table and opening his saddle-bags.
Thousands and thousands of lives are lost only by
delaying to send for medical advice till it is too
late; thousands that might have been saved as well
as not, if only taken in season.
But doctor, you don't think it's too late for
Polly
,
do you? said Mrs. Gray.
I think her case, to say the least, is extremely
doubtful, said the doctor. Her appearance is
very remarkable. Whatever her disease is, it has
made such progress, and life is so nearly extinct,
that it is impossible to tell what were the original
symptoms, and consequently what applications are
best to be made.
Well, now, doctor, said Mrs. Livermore,
excuse
me for speakin; but I'm a good deal older
than you are, and have seen a great deal of
sickness
in my day, and I've been in here with Polly a
number of times to-day, and sometimes this
evening
,
and I'm satisfied, doctor, there's something the
matter of her insides.
Undoubtedly, said the doctor, looking very
grave.
This new hint from Mrs. Livermore seemed to
give Mrs. Gray new hope, and she appealed again
to the doctor.
Well, now, doctor, said she, don't you think
Mrs. Livermore has the right of it?
Most unquestionably, said the doctor.
Well, then, doctor, if you should give her
something
that's pretty powerful to operate inwardly,
don't you think it might help her?
It might, and it might not, said the doctor;
the powers of life are so nearly exhausted, I must
tell you frankly I have very little hope of being
able to rally them. There is not life enough left to
indicate the disease or show the remedies that are
wanted. Applications now must be made entirely
in the dark, and leave the effect to chance.
At this, Mrs. Livermore took the candle and was
proceeding to remove it from the room, when the
doctor, perceiving her mistake, called her back.
He did not mean to administer the medicine
literally
in a dark room, but simply in a state of darkness
and ignorance as to the nature of the disease. It
was a very strange case; it was certain life could
hold out but a short time longer; he felt bound to
do something, and therefore proceeded to prepare
such applications and remedies as his best
judgment
dictated. These were administered without
confidence, and their effect awaited with painful
solicitude
.
They either produced no perceptible
effect
at all, or very different from the ordinary
results
of such applications.
I should like, said Doctor Longley to the
deacon
,
to have you call in Doctor Stubbs; this is a
very extraordinary case, and I should prefer that
some other medical practitioner might be present.
The deacon accordingly hastened to call
Doctor
Stubbs, a young man who had come into the
place a short time before, with a high reputation,
but not a favorite with the deacon and his family,
on account of his being rather fresh from college,
and full of modern innovations.
After Doctor Stubbs had examined the patient,
and made various inquiries of the family, he and
Doctor Longley held a brief consultation. Their
united wisdom, however, was not sufficient to throw
any light upon the case or to afford any relief.
Have you thought of poison? said Doctor
Longley.
Yes, said Doctor Stubbs, but there are
certain
indications in the case, which forbid that
altogether
.
Indeed, I can form no satisfactory opinion
about it; it is the most anomalous case I ever knew.
Before their conference was brought to a close,
the deacon called them, saying he believed Polly
was a going. They came into the room and
hastened
to the bed-side.
Yes, said Doctor Stubbs, looking at the
patient
,
those are dying struggles; in a short time
all her troubles in this life will be over.
The patient sunk gradually and quietly away,
and in the course of two hours after the arrival of
Doctor Stubbs, all signs of life were gone.
The Lord's will be done, said the deacon, as
he stood by the bed and saw her chest heave for
the last time.
Mrs. Gray sat in the corner of the room with her
apron to her face weeping aloud. Old Mrs.
Livermore
and two other females, who had been called
in during the night, were already busily employed
in preparing for laying out the corpse.
It was about daybreak when the two doctors left
the house and started for home.
Very singular case, said Doctor Stubbs, who
spoke with more ease and freedom, now that they
were out of the way of the afflicted family. We
ought not to give it up so, doctor; we ought to
follow
this case up till we ascertain what was the
cause of her death. What say to a post mortem
examination?
I always dislike them, said Doctor Longley;
they are ugly uncomfortable jobs; and besides, I
doubt whether the deacon's folks would consent to
it.
It is important for us, as well as for the cause of
the science, said Doctor Stubbs, that something
should be done about it. We are both young, and
it may have an injurious bearing upon our
reputation
if we are not able to give any explanation of
the case. I consider my reputation at stake as well
as yours, as I was called in for consultation. There
will doubtless be an hundred rumors afloat, and the
older physicians, who look upon us, you know, with
rather an evil eye, will be pretty sure to lay hold of
the matter and turn it greatly to our disadvantage,
if we cannot show facts for our vindication. The
deacon's folks
must
consent, and you had better go
down after breakfast and have a talk with the
deacon
about it.
Doctor Longley felt the force of the reasoning
and consented to go. Accordingly, after breakfast,
he returned to Deacon Gray's, and kindly offered
his services, if there was any assistance he could
render in making preparations for the funeral. The
deacon felt much obliged to him, but didn't know
as there was anything for which they particularly
needed his assistance. The doctor then broached
the subject of the very sudden and singular death of
Polly, and how important it was for the living that
the causes of such a sudden death should, if
possible
,
be ascertained, and delicately hinted that the
only means of obtaining this information, so
desirable
for the benefit of the science and so valuable for
all living, was by opening and examining the body
after death.
At this the deacon looked up at him with such an
awful expression of holy horror, that the doctor
saw at once it would be altogether useless to
pursue
the subject further. Accordingly, after
advising
,
on account of the warm weather and the
patient
dying suddenly and in full blood, not to
postpone
the funeral later than that afternoon, the
doctor
took his leave.
Well, what is the result? said Doctor Stubbs,
as Doctor Longley entered his door.
Oh, as I expected, said Doctor Longley. The
moment I hinted at the subject to the deacon, I saw
by his looks, if it were to save his own life and the
lives of all his friends, he never would consent to
it.
Well, 'tis astonishing, said Doctor Stubbs,
that people who have common sense should have
so little sense on a subject of this kind. I won't be
baffled so, Doctor Longley; I'll tell you what I'll
do. What time is she to be buried?
This afternoon, said Doctor Longley.
In the burying ground by the old meeting-house
up the road. I suppose, said Doctor Stubbs.
Yes, undoubtedly, replied Dr. Longley.
Well, I'll have that corpse taken up this night,
and you may depend upon it, said Doctor Stubbs.
I'll not only ascertain the cause of her death, but
I want a subject for dissection, and she having died
so suddenly will make an excellent one.
Doctor Longley shuddered a little at the bold
project
of Doctor Stubbs. You know, doctor, there
is a law against it, said he, and besides, the
burying
ground is in such a lonely place and
surrounded
by woods, I don't believe you can find anybody
with nerve enough to go there and take up a newly
buried corpse in the night.
Let me alone for that, said Doctor Stubbs.
I know a chap that would do it every night in the
week if I wanted him to; a friend of mine down
there in the college, in the senior class. He has
nerve enough to go anywhere, and is up to a job of
this kind at any time. The business is all
arranged
,
doctor, and I shall go through with it. Joe
Palmer is the man for it, and Rufus Barnes will go
with him. I'd go myself, but it would be more
prudent
for me to be at home, for in case of accident,
and the thing should be discovered, suspicion would
be likely to fall on me, and it would be important
for me to be able to prove where I was. Rufus
must go to the funeral and see whereabouts the
corpse is buried, so he can find the place in a dark
night, and I shall have to go down to the college
the first of the evening after Joe myself, and get
him started, and then come right home, and stay at
home, so that I can prove an alibi in case of any
questions. Don't I understand it, doctor?
Yes, full well enough, said Doctor Longley,
but I had rather you would be in the scrape than
I should.
That evening, half an hour after dark, there was
a light rap at Joe Palmer's door in the third story
of one of the college buildings. The door was
partly open, and Joe said come in. No one
entered
,
but in a few moments the rap was heard
again. Come in, said Joe. Still no one
entered
.
Presently a figure, concealed under a cloak
and with muffled face, appeared partly before the
door, and said something in a low voice. Joe
looked
wild and agitated. Some college scrape, he
thought, but what was the nature of it he could not
divine. The figure looked mysterious. Presently
the voice was heard again, and understood to utter
the word Palmer. Joe was still more agitated, and
looked at his chum most inquiringly. His chum
stepped to the door and asked what was wanting.
The figure drew back into the darkness of the hall,
and answered in a faint voice, that he wanted
Palmer
.
At last Palmer screwed his resolution up to
the sticking point and ventured as far as the door,
while his chum stepped back into the room. The
figure again came forward and whispered to
Palmer
to come out, for he wanted to speak with him.
But who are you? said Palmer.
The figure partially uncovered his face, and
whispered Doctor Stubbs.
Palmer at once recognized him, and stepped back
as bold as a lion, and took his hat and went out.
In a few minutes he returned and told his chum,
with rather a mysterious air, that he was going out
with a friend to be gone two or three hours, that
he need not feel uneasy about him, and might leave
the door unfastened for him till he returned.
Doctor Stubbs, having given Joe and Rufus full
directions how to proceed, telling them to get a
large wide chaise, so that they could manage to
carry the corpse conveniently, and informing them
where they could find spades and shovels deposited
by the side of the road for the purpose, left them
and hastened home.
Well now, Rufe, said Joe, we'll just go over
to Jake Rider's and get one of his horses and chaise.
But we needn't be in a hurry, for we don't want
to get there much before midnight; and we'll go
into the store here and get a drink of brandy to
begin
with, for this kind of business needs a little
stimulus
.
Having braced their nerves with a drink of
brandy
,
they proceeded to Jacob Rider's.
Jake, give us a horse and chaise to take a ride
three or four hours, said Joe. You needn't mind
setting up for us; we'll put the horse up when we
come back, and take good care of him; we know
where to put him. We don't want a nag; an old
steady horse that will give us an easy pleasant
ride.
Old Tom is jest the horse you want, said
Jacob
,
and there's a good easy going chaise.
That chaise isn't wide enough, said Joe; give
us the widest one you've got.
But that's plenty wide enough for two to ride
in, said Jacob; I don't see what you want a
wider
chaise than that for.
Oh, I like to have plenty of elbow room, said
Joe.
Maybe you are going to have a lady to ride
with you, said Jacob.
Joe laughed, and whispered to Rufus that Jake
had hit nearer the mark than he was aware of.
Jacob selected another chaise. There is one,
said he wide enough for three to ride in, and even
four upon a pinch.
That'll do, said Joe; now put in old Tom.
The horse was soon harnessed, and Joe and
Rufus
jumped into the chaise and drove off.
Confound these college chaps, said Jacob to
himself as they drove out of the yard; they are
always a sky-larkin' somewhere or other. There's
one thing in it though, they pay me well for my
horses. But these two fellows wanting such a
5
broad chaise; they are going to have a real frolic
somewhere to night. I've a plaguy good mind to
jump on to one of the horses and follow, and see
what sort of snuff they are up to. It's so dark I
could do it just as well as not, without the least
danger
of their seeing me.
No sooner thought than done. Jake at once
mounted one of his horses, and followed the chaise.
There was no moon, and the night was cloudy and
dark; but a slight rattle in one of the wheels of the
chaise, enabled him easily to follow it, though
entirely
out of sight. Having gone about two miles
the chaise stopped at the corner, about a hundred
rods from the house of Dr. Stubbs. Jake got off
and hitched his horse, and crept carefully along by
the side of the fence to see what was done there.
By stooping down and looking up against a clear
patch of sky, he could see one of the two leave the
chaise and go to the fence by the side of the road,
and return again, carrying something in his arms to
the chaise. He repeated this operation twice; but
what he carried Jake could not discern. Perhaps
it might be some baskets of refreshments. They
were going off to some house to have a frolic. The
chaise moved on again, and jake mounted his horse
and followed. They went up the road till they
came to the old meeting-house; they passed it a
little, and came against the old burying ground.
The chaise stopped and Jake stopped. The chaise
stood still for the space of about five minutes, and
there was not the least sound to be heard in any
direction
.
At last, from the little rattle of the chaise
wheel, he perceived they were moving at a
moderate
walk. They came to the corner of the
burying
ground, and turned a little out of the road and
stopped the chaise under the shadow of a large
spreading tree, where it could not be perceived by
any one passing in the road, even should the clouds
brush away and leave it starlight.
It is very odd, thought Jake, that they should
stop at such a place as this in a dark night; the last
place in the world I should think of stopping at.
Jake dismounted and hitched his horse a little
distance, and crept carefully up to watch their
movements
.
They took something out of the chaise,
passed along by the fence, went through the little
gate, and entered the burying ground. Here a new
light seemed to flash upon Jake's mind.
I hope no murder has been committed, thought
he to himself; but it's pretty clear something is to
be buried here to-night that the world must know
nothing about.
Jake was perplexed, and in doubt as to what he
should do. He had some conscience, and felt as
though he ought to investigate the matter, and put
a stop to the business if anything very wicked was
going on. But then there were other
considerations
that weighed on the other side. If murder
had been committed it was within the range of
possibility
,
and not very unreasonable to suppose, that
murder might be committed again to conceal it.
There were two of them, and he was alone. It
might not be entirely safe for him to interfere. He
would hardly care to be thrown into a grave and
buried there that night. And then, again, Jake was
avaricious, and wouldn't care to break friends with
those college fellows, for they paid him a good deal
of money. On the whole, he was resolved to keep
quiet and see the end of the matter.
Joe and Rufus walked two-thirds of the way
across the burying ground and stopped. Jake
followed
at a careful distance, and when he found
they had stopped, he crept slowly up on the darkest
side, so near that, partly by sight and partly by
sound, he could discover what took place. There
was not a loud word spoken, though he
occasionally
heard them whisper to each other. Then he
heard the sound of shovels and the moving of gravel.
It is true, said Jake to himself, they are
digging
a grave! and the cold sweat started on his
forehead. Still he resolved to be quiet and see it
all through. Once or twice they stopped and
seemed
to be listening, as though they thought they
heard some noise. Then he could hear them
whisper
to each other, but could not understand what
they said. After they had been digging and
throwing
out gravel some time, he heard a sound like the
light knock of a shovel upon the lid of a coffin.
Take care, said Joe, in a very loud whisper,
it'll never do to make such a noise as that; it
could be heard almost half a mile; do be more
careful
.
Again they pursued their work, and
occasionally
a hollow sound like a shovel scraping over a
coffin
was heard. At length their work of throwing
out gravel seemed to be completed; and then there
was a pause for some time, interrupted
occasionally
by sounds of screwing, and wedging, and
wrenching
;
and at last they seemed to be lifting some
heavy substance out of the grave. They carried
it toward the gate. Jake was lying almost upon
the ground, and as they passed near him, he could
perceive they were carrying some white object
about the length and size of a corpse. They went
out at the gate and round to the chaise; and
presently
they returned again, and appeared by their
motions and the sound to be filling up the grave.
Jake took this opportunity to go and examine the
chaise; and sure enough he found there a full-sized
corpse, wrapped in a white sheet, lying in the
centre
of the chaise, the feet resting on the floor, the
body leaning across the seat, and the head resting
against the centre of the back part of the chaise.
Only some scrape of the Doctor's after all, said
Jake to himself, who now began to breathe
somewhat
easier than he had done for some time past.
But it's rather shameful business, though; this
must be Deacon Gray's daughter, I'm sure; and it's
a shame to treat the old man in this shabby kind of
way. I'll put a stop to this, anyhow. Polly Gray
was too good a sort of a gal to be chopped up like
a quarter of beef, according to my way of thinking,
and it shan't be.
Jake then lifted the corpse out of the chaise,
carried
it a few rods farther from the road, laid it down,
took off the winding sheet, wrapped it carefully
round himself, went back and got into the chaise,
and placed himself exactly in the position in which
the corpse had been left. He had remained in that
situation but a short time before Joe and Rufus,
having filled up the grave and made all right there,
came and seated themselves in the chaise, one on
each side of the corpse, and drove slowly and
quietly
off.
I'm glad it's over, said Rufus, fetching a long
breath. My heart's been in my mouth the whole
time. I thought I heard somebody coming half a
dozen times; and then it's such a dismal, gloomy
place too. You wouldn't catch me there again, in
such a scrape, I can tell you.
Well, I was calm as clock-work the whole
time, said Joe. You should have such pluck as
I've got, Rufe; nothing ever frightens me.
At that moment the chaise wheel struck a stone,
and caused the corpse to roll suddenly against Joe.
He clapped up his hand to push it a little back, and
instead of a cold clammy corpse, he felt his hand
pressed against a warm face of live flesh. As
quick as though he had been struck by lightning,
Joe dropped the reins, and with one bound sprang
a rod from the chaise and ran for his life. Rufus,
without knowing the cause of this strange and
sudden
movement, sprang from the other side with
almost
equal agility, and followed Joe with his
utmost
speed. They scarcely stopped to take breath
till they had run two miles and got into Joe's room
at the college, and shut the door and locked
themselves
in. Here, having sworn Joe's chum to
secrecy
,
they began to discuss the matter. But
concerning
the very strange warmth of the corpse they
could come to no satisfactory conclusion.
Whether
it could be, that they had not actually taken up
the corpse from the grave, but before they had got
down to it some evil spirit had come in the shape
of the corpse and deceived them, or whether it was
actually the corpse, and it had come to life, or
whether it was the ghost of Polly Gray, were
questions
they could not decide. They agreed,
however
,
to go the next morning by sunrise on to the
ground, and see what discoveries they could make.
When Jacob Rider found himself alone in the
chaise, being convinced that Joe and Rufus would
not come back to trouble him that night, he turned
about and drove back to the burying ground.
Now, said Jake, I think the best thing I can
do, for all concerned, is to put Polly Gray back
where she belongs, and there let her rest.
Accordingly Jake went to work and opened the
grave again, carried the corpse and replaced it as
well as he could, and filled up the grave and
rounded
it off in good order. He then took his horses and
chaise and returned home, well satisfied with his
night's work.
The next morning, some time before sunrise, and
before any one were stirring in the neighborhood,
Joe and Rufus was at the old burying ground.
They went round the inclosure, went to the tree
where they had fastened their horse, and looked on
every side, but discovered nothing. They went
through the gate, and across to the grave where
they had been the night before. The grave
looked
all right, as though it had not been touched since
the funeral. They could see nothing of the horse
or chaise, and they concluded if the corpse or evil
spirit, or whatever it was in the chaise, had left the
horse to himself, he probably found his way
directly
home. They thought it best therefore
immediately
to go and see Jake, and make some kind of
an explanation. So they went over immediately to
Jake's stable, and found the horse safe in his stall.
Presently Jake made his appearance.
Well, your confounded old horse, said Joe,
wouldn't stay hitched last night. He left us in
the lurch, and we had to come home afoot. I see
he's come home, though. Chaise all right, I hope.
Yes, all right, said Jake.
Well, how much for the ride, said Joe,
seeing
we didn't ride but one way?
Seeing you rode
part way
back, said Jake, I
shall charge you fifty dollars.
Joe started and looked round, but a knowing leer
in Jake's eye convinced him it was no joke. He
handed Jake the fifty dollars, at the same time
placing
his finger emphatically across his lips; and Jake
took the fifty dollars, whispering in Joe's ear, dead
folks tell no tales. Jake then put his finger across
his lips, and Joe and Rufus bade him good
morning
.
CHRISTOPHER CROTCHET:
THE SINGING-MASTER.
BY SEBA SMITH.
Your
New England country singing-master is a
peculiar character; who shall venture to describe
him? During his stay in a country village, he is
the most important personage in it. The common
school-master, to be sure, is a man of dignity and
importance. Children never pass him on the road,
without turning square round, pulling off their hats,
and making one of their best and most profound
bows. He is looked up to with universal deference
both by young and old, and is often invited out to
tea. Or, if he boards round, great is the parade,
and great the preparation, by each family, when
their week for boarding the master draws near.
Then not unfrequently a well fatted porker is killed,
and the spare ribs are duly hung round the pantry
in readiness for roasting. A half bushel of
sausages
are made up into links, and suspended on a
pole near the ceiling from one end of the kitchen
to the other. And the Saturday beforehand, if the
school-master is to come on Monday, the work of
preparation reaches its crisis. Then it is, that the
old oven, if it be not heaten seven times hotter
than it is wont to be, is at least heated seven times;
and apple-pies, and pumpkin-pies, and mince-pies
are turned out by dozens, and packed away in
closet and cellar for the coming week. And the
fore room, which has not had a fire in it for the
winter, is now duly washed and scrubbed and put
to rights, and wood is heaped on the fire with a
liberal hand, till the room itself becomes almost
another oven. George is up betimes on Monday
morning to go with his hand-sled and bring the
master's trunk; Betsey and Sally are rigged out in
the best calico gowns, the little ones have their
faces washed and their hair combed with more than
ordinary care, and the mother's cap has an extra
crimp. And all this stir and preparation for the
common school-master. And yet he is but an
every-day planet, that moves in a regular orbit, and
comes round at least every winter.
But the
singing-master
is your true comet.
Appearing
at no regular intervals, he comes suddenly,
and often unexpected. Brilliant, mysterious and
erratic, no wonder that he attracts all eyes, and
produces a tremendous sensation. Not only the
children, but the whole family, flock to the windows
when he passes, and a face may be seen at every
pane of glass, eagerly peering out to catch a
glimpse of the singing-master. Even the very
dogs seem to partake of the awe he inspires, and
bark with uncommon fierceness whenever they
meet him.
O, father, said little Jimmy Brown, as he came
running into the house on a cold December night,
with eyes staring wide open, and panting for breath,
O, father, Mr. Christopher Crotchet from
Quavertown
,
is over to Mr. Gibbs' tavern, come to see
about keeping singing-school; and Mr. Gibbs, and
a whole parcel more of 'em, wants you to come
right over there, cause they're goin' to have a
meeting this evening to see about hiring of him.
Squire Brown and his family, all except Jimmy,
were seated round the supper table when this
interesting
piece of intelligence was announced. Every
one save Squire Brown himself, gave a sudden
start, and at once suspended operations; but the
Squire, who was a very moderate man, and never
did anything from impulse, ate on without turning
his head, or changing his position. After a short
pause, however, which was a moment of intense
anxiety to some members of the family, he replied
to Jimmy as follows:
I shan't do no sich thing; if they want a
singing-school
,
they may get it themselves. A
singing-school
wont do us no good, and I've ways enough
to spend my money without paying it for singing.
Turning his head round and casting a severe look
upon Jimmy, he proceeded with increasing energy:
Now, Sir, hang your hat up and set down and
eat your supper; I should like to know what sent
you off over to the tavern without leave.
I wanted to see the singing-master, said
Jimmy
.
Sam Gibbs said there was a singing-master
over to their house, and so I wanted to see him.
Well, I'll singing-master you, said the Squire,
if I catch you to go off so again without leave.
Come, don't stand there; set down and eat your
supper, or I'll trounce you in two minutes.
There, I declare, said Mrs. Brown, I do think
it too bad. I do wish I could live in peace one
moment of my life. The children will be spoilt
and ruined. They never can stir a step nor hardly
breathe, but what they must be scolded and fretted
to death.
Squire Brown had been accustomed to these
sudden squalls about twenty-five years, they having
commenced some six months or so after his
marriage
;
and long experience had taught him, that
the only way to escape with safety, was to bear
away immediately and scud before the wind.
Accordingly
he turned again to Jimmy, and with a
much softened tone addressed him as follows:
Come, Jimmy, my son, set down and eat your
supper, that's a good boy. You shouldn't go away
without asking your mother or me; but you'll try
to remember next time, won't you?
Jimmy and his mother were both somewhat
soothed by this well-timed suavity, and the boy
took his seat at the table.
Now, pa, said Miss Jerusha Brown, you
will
go over and see about having a singing-school,
won't you? I want to go dreadfully?
Oh, I can't do anything about that, said the
Squire; it'll cost a good deal of money, and I
can't afford it. And besides, there's no use at all in
it. You can sing enough now, any of you; you
are singing half your time.
There, said Mrs. Brown, that's just the way.
Our children will never have a chance to be
anything
as long as they live. Other folks' children
have a chance to go to singing-schools, and to see
young company, and to be something in the world.
Here's our Jerusha has got to be in her
twenty-fifth
year now, and if she's ever going to have
young company, and have a chance to be anything,
she must have it soon; for she'll be past the time
bime-by for sich things. 'Tisn't as if we was poor
and couldn't afford it; for you know, Mr. Brown,
you pay the largest tax of anybody in the town,
and can afford to give the children a chance to be
something in the world, as well as not. And as for
living in this kind of way any longer, I've no notion
on't.
Mrs. Brown knew how to follow up an
advantage
.
She had got her husband upon the retreat
in the onset a moment before, in reference to
Jimmy's
absence, and the closing part of this last
speech was uttered with an energy and
determination
,
of which Squire Brown knew too well the
import to disregard it. Perceiving that a storm
was brewing that would burst upon his head with
tremendous power, if he did not take care to avoid
it, he finished his supper with all convenient
despatch
,
rose from the table, put on his great-coat
and hat, and marched deliberately over to Gibbs'
tavern. Mrs. Brown knew at once, that she had
won the victory, and that they should have a
singing-school
.
The children also had become so well
versed in the science of their mother's tactics, that
they understood the same thing, and immediately
began to discuss matters preparatory to attending
the school.
Miss Jerusha said she must have her new calico
gown made right up, the next day; and her mother
said she should, and David might go right over
after
Betsey Davis to come to work on it the next
morning.
How delightful it will be to have a
singing-school
,
said Miss Jerusha: Jimmy, what sort of
a looking man is Mr. Crotchet?
Oh, he is a slick kind of a looking man, said
Jimmy.
Is he a young man, or a married man?
inquired
Miss Jerusha.
Ho! married? no; I guess he isn't, said
Jimmy, I don't believe he's more than twenty
years old.
Poh; I don't believe that story, said Jerusha,
a singing-master must be as much as twenty-five
years old, I know! How is he dressed? Isn't he
dressed quite genteel?
Oh, he's dressed pretty slick, said Jimmy.
Well, that's what makes him look so young,
said Miss Jerusha; I dare say he's as much as
twenty-five years old; don't you think he is,
mother
?
Well, I think it's pretty likely he is, said Mrs.
Brown; singing-masters are generally about that
age.
How does he look? said Miss Jerusha; is he
handsome?
He's handsome enough, said Jimmy, only he's
got a red head and freckly face.
Now, Jim, I don't believe a word you say. You
are saying this, only just to plague
me
.
To understand the propriety of this last remark
of Miss Jerusha, the reader should be informed, that
for the last ten years she had looked upon every
young man who came into the place, as her own
peculiar property. And in all cases, in order to
obtain possession of her aforesaid property, she had
adopted prompt measures, and pursued them with
a diligence worthy of all praise.
No I ain't neither, said Jimmy, I say he has
got a red head and freckly face.
La, well, said Mrs. Brown, what if he has?
I'm sure a red head don't look bad; and one of
the handsomest men that ever I see, had a freckly
face.
Well, Jimmy, how large is he? Is he a tall
man, or a short man? said Miss Jerusha.
Why, he isn't bigger round than I be, said
Jimmy; and I guess he isn't quite as tall as a
hay-pole
;
but he's so tall he has to stoop when he goes
into the door.
So far from adding to the shock, which Miss
Jerusha's
nerves had already received from the account
of the red head and freckly face, this last piece of
intelligence was on the whole rather consolatory;
for she lacked but an inch and a half of six feet in
height herself.
Well, Jimmy, said Miss Jerusha, when he
stands up, take him altogether, isn't he a
good-looking
young man?
I don't know anything about that, said Jimmy;
he looks the most like the tongs in the riddle, of
anything I can think of:
`Long legs and crooked thighs,
Little head and no eyes.'
There, Jim, you little plague, said Miss
Jerusha
,
you shall go right off to bed, if you don't
leave off your nonsense. I won't hear another word
of it.
I don't care it you won't, said Jimmy, it's all
true, every word of it.
What! then the singing-muster hasn't got no
eyes, has he? said Miss Jerusha; that's a pretty
story.
I don't mean, he hasn't got no eyes at all, said
Jimmy, only his eyes are dreadful little, and you
can't see but one of 'em to time neither, they're
twisted round so.
A little cross-eyed, I s'pose, said Mrs. Brown,
that's all; I don't think that hurts the looks of a
man a bit; it only makes him look a little
sharper
.
While these things were transpiring at Mr.
Brown's, matters of weight and importance were
being discussed at the tavern. About a dozen of
the neighbors had collected there early in the
evening
,
and every one, as soon as he found that Mr.
Christopher Crotchet from Quavertown was in the
village, was for having a singing-school forthwith,
cost what it would. They accordingly proceeded
at once to ascertain Mr. Crotchet's terms. His
proposals were, to keep twenty evenings for twenty
dollars and found, or for thirty and board
himself
.
The school to be kept three evenings in a
week. A subscription-paper was opened, and the
sum of fifteen dollars was at last made up. But
that was the extent to which they could go; not
another dollar could be raised. Much anxiety was
now felt for the arrival of Squire Brown; for the
question of school or no school depended entirely
on him.
Squire Brown's got money enough, said Mr.
Gibbs, and if he only has the will, we shall have a
school.
Not exactly, said Mr. Jones; if
Mrs.
Brown
has the will, we shall have a school, let the Squire's
will be what it may.
Before the laugh occasioned by this last remark
had fully subsided, Squire Brown entered, much to
the joy of the whole company.
Squire Brown, I'm glad to see you, said Mr.
Gibbs; shall I introduce you to Mr. Christopher
Crotchet, singing-master from Quavertown.
The Squire was a very short man, somewhat
inclined
to corpulence, and Mr. Crotchet, according
to Jimmy's account, was not quite as tall as a
hay-pole
;
so that by dint of the Squire's throwing his
head back and looking up, and Mr. Crotchet's
canting
his head on one side in order to bring one eye
to bear on the Squire, the parties were brought
within each other's field of vision. The Squire
made a bow, which was done by throwing his head
upward, and Mr. Crotchet returned the compliment
by extending his arm downward to the Squire and
shaking hands.
When the ceremony of introduction was over,
Mr. Gibbs laid the whole matter before Mr. Brown,
showed him the subscription-paper, and told him
they were all depending upon him to decide
whether
they should have a singing-school or not. Squire
Brown put on his spectacles and read the
subscription-paper
over two or three times, till he fully
understood
the terms, and the deficiency in the amount
subscribed. Then without saying a word, he took
a pen and deliberately subscribed five dollars.
That settled the business; the desired sum was
raised, and the school was to go ahead. It was
agreed that it should commence on the following
evening, and that Mr. Crotchet should board with
Mr. Gibbs one week, with the Squire the next, and
so go round through the neighborhood.
On the following day there was no small
commotion
among the young folks of the village, in
making preparation for the evening school. New
singing-books were purchased, dresses were
prepared
,
curling-tongs and crimping-irons were put
in requisition, and early in the evening the long
chamber in Gibbs' tavern, which was called by way
of eminence the hall, was well filled by youth of
both sexes, the old folks not being allowed to
attend
that evening, lest the boys and gals should
be diffident about sounding the notes. A range
of long narrow tables was placed round three sides
of the hall, with benches behind them, upon which
the youth were seated. A singing-book and a
candle
were shared by two, all round the room, till you
came to Miss Jerusha Brown, who had taken the
uppermost seat, and monopolized a whole book and
a whole candle to her own use. Betsey Buck, a
lively, reckless sort of a girl of sixteen, who cared
for nobody nor nothing in this world, but was full
of frolic and fun, had by chance taken a seat next
to Miss Jerusha. Miss Betsey had a slight inward
turn of one eye, just enough to give her a roguish
look, that comported well with her character.
While they were waiting for the entrance of the
master, many a suppressed laugh, and now and then
an audible giggle, passed round the room, the mere
ebullitions of buoyant spirits and contagious mirth,
without aim or object. Miss Jerusha, who was
trying
to behave her prettiest, repeatedly chided their
rudeness, and more than once told Miss Betsey
Buck, that she ought to be ashamed to be laughing
so much; for what would Mr. Crotchet think, if
he should come in and find them all of a giggle?
After a while the door opened, and Mr.
Christopher
Crotchet entered. He bent his body slightly,
as he passed the door, to prevent a concussion of
his head against the lintel, and then walked very
erect into the middle of the floor, and made a short
speech to his class. His grotesque appearance
caused a slight tittering round the room, and Miss
Betsey was even guilty of an incipient audible
laugh, which however she had the tact so far to
turn into a cough as to save appearances. Still it
was observed by Miss Jerusha, who told her again
in a low whisper that she ought to be ashamed, and
added that Mr. Crotchet was a most splendid man;
a beautiful man.
After Mr. Crotchet had made his introductory
speech, he proceeded to try the voices of his pupils,
making each one alone follow him in rising and
falling
the notes. He passed round without difficulty
till he came to Miss Betsey Buck. She rather
hesitated
to let her voice be heard alone; but the
master
told her she must sound, and holding his head
down so close to hers that they almost met, he
commenced
pouring his faw, sole, law, into her ear.
Miss Betsey drew back a little, but followed with a
low and somewhat tremulous voice, till she had
sounded three or four notes, when her risible
muscles
got the mastery, and she burst out in an
unrestrained
fit of laughter.
The master looked confused and cross; and Miss
Jerusha even looked crosser than the master. She
again reproached Miss Betsey for her rudeness, and
told her in an emphatic whisper, which was
intended
more especially for the master's ear, that such
conduct was shameful, and if she couldn't behave
better she ought to stay at home.
Miss Jerusha's turn to sound came next, and she
leaned her head full half way across the table to
meet the master's, and sounded the notes clear
through, three or four times over, from bottom to
top and from top to bottom; and sounded them
with a loudness and strength fully equal to that of
the master.
When the process of sounding the voices
separately
had been gone through with, they were
called upon to sound together; and before the close
of the evening they were allowed to commence the
notes of some easy tunes. It is unnecessary here
to give a detailed account of the progress that was
made, or to attempt to describe the jargon of strange
sounds, with which Gibbs' hall echoed that night.
Suffice it to say, that the proficiency of the pupils
was so great, that on the tenth evening, or when
the school was half through, the parents were
permitted
to be present, and were delighted to hear
their children sing Old Hundred, Mear, St. Martin,
Northfield, and Hallowell, with so much accuracy,
that those who knew the tunes, could readily tell,
every time, which one was being performed. Mrs.
Brown was almost in ecstacies at the performance,
and sat the whole evening and looked at Jerusha,
who sung with great earnestness and with a voice
far above all the rest. Even Squire Brown
himself
was so much softened that evening, that his
face wore a sort of smile, and he told his wife he
didn't grudge his five dollars, a bit.
The school went on swimmingly. Mr. Crotchet
became the lion of the village; and Miss Jerusha
Brown thought he improved upon acquaintance
astonishingly. Great preparation was made at
Squire Brown's for the important week of boarding
the singing-master. They outdid all the village in
the quantity and variety of their eatables, and at
every meal Miss Jerusha was particularly
assiduous
in placing all the good things in the
neighborhood
on Mr. Crotchet's plate. In fact, so
bountifully
and regularly was Mr. Crotchet stuffed during
the week, that his lank form began to assume a
perceptible
fulness. He evidently seemed very fond
of his boarding place, especially at meal time; and
made himself so much at home, that Mrs. Brown
and Jerusha were in a state of absolute felicity the
whole week. It was true he spent two evenings
abroad during the week, and it was reported that
one of them was passed at Mr. Buck's. But Miss
Jerusha would not believe a word of such a story.
She said there was no young folks at Mr. Buck's
except Betsey, and she was sure Mr. Crotchet was
a man of more sense than to spend his evenings
with such a wild, rude thing as Betsey Buck.
Still, however, the report gave her a little
uneasiness
;
and when it was ascertained, that during the
week on which Mr. Crotchet boarded at Mr. Buck's
he spent every evening at home, except the three
devoted to the singing-school, Miss Jerusha's
uneasiness
evidently increased. She resolved to make
a desperate effort to counteract these untoward
influences
,
and to teach Miss Betsey Buck not to
interfere
with other folk's concerns. For this
purpose
she made a grand evening party, and invited
all the young folks of the village, except Miss Buck,
who was pointedly left out. The treat was
elaborate
for a country village, and Miss Jerusha was
uncommonly assiduous in her attentions to Mr.
Crotchet during the evening. But to her
inexpressible
surprise and chagrin, about eight o'clock, Mr.
Crotchet put on his hat and great coat and bade the
company good night. Mrs. Brown looked very
blue, and Miss Jerusha's nerves were in a state of
high excitement. What could it mean? She
would give anything in the world to know where
he had gone. She ran up into the chamber and
looked out from the window. The night was
rather
dark, but she fancied she saw him making his
way toward Mr. Buck's. The company for the
remainder
of the evening had rather a dull time; and
Miss Jerusha passed almost a sleepless night.
The next evening Miss Jerusha was early at the
singing-school. She took her seat with a
disconsolate
air, opened her singing-book and commenced
singing Hallowell in the following words:
As on some lonely building's top,
The sparrow tells her moan,
Far from the tents of joy and hope,
I sit and grieve alone.
On former occasions, when the scholars were
singing before school commenced, the moment the
master opened the door they broke off short, even
if they were in the midst of a tune. But now, when
the master entered, Miss Jerusha kept on singing.
She went through the whole tune after Mr.
Crotchet
came in, and went back and repeated the latter
half of it with a loud and full voice, which caused a
laugh among the scholars, and divers streaks of red
to pass over the master's face.
At the close of the evening's exercises Miss
Jerusha
hurried on her shawl and bonnet, and
watched
the movements of the master. She perceived
he went out directly after Betsey Buck, and she
hastened after them with becoming speed. She
contrived to get between Miss Buck and the
master
as they walked along the road, and kept Mr.
Crotchet in close conversation with her, or rather
kept herself in close conversation with Mr.
Crotchet
,
till they came to the corner that turned down to
Mr. Buck's house. Here Mr. Crotchet left her
somewhat abruptly, and walked by the side of Miss
Betsey toward Mr. Buck's. This was more than
Miss Jerusha's nerves could well bear. She was
under too much excitement to proceed on her way
home. She stopped and gazed after the couple as
they receded from her; and as their forms became
indistinct in the darkness of the night, she turned
and followed them, just keeping them in view till
they reachnd the house. The door opened, and to
her inexpressible horror, they both went in. It was
past ten o'clock, too! She was greatly puzzled.
The affair was entirely inexplicable to her. It could
not be, however, that he would stop many minutes,
and she waited to see the result. Presently a light
appeared in the fore-room; and from the
mellowness
of that light a fire was evidently kindled there.
Miss Jerusha approached the house and
reconnoitred
.
She tried to look in at the window, but a
thick curtain effectually prevented her from seeing
anything within. The curtain did not reach quite
to the top of the window, and she thought she saw
the shadows of two persons before the fire, thrown
against the ceiling. She was determined by some
means or other to know the worst of it. She
looked
round the door-yard and found a long piece of
board. She thought by placing this against the
house by the side of the window, she might be able
to climb up and look over the top of the curtain.
The board was accordingly raised on one end and
placed carefully by the side of the window, and Miss
Jerusha eagerly commenced the task of climbing.
She had reached the top of the curtain and cast one
glance into the room, where, sure enough, she
beheld
Mr. Crotchet seated close by the side of Miss
Betsey. At this interesting moment, from some
cause or other, either from her own trembling, for
she was exceedingly agitated, or from the board
not being properly supported at the bottom, it
slipped
and canted, and in an instant one half of the
window was dashed with a tremendous crash into
the room.
Miss Jerusha fell to the ground, but not being
much injured by the fall, she sprang to her feet and
ran with the fleetness of a wild deer. The door
opened, and out came Mr. Crotchet and Mr. Buck,
and started in the race. They thought they had a
glimpse of some person running up the road when
they first came out, and Mr. Crotchet's long legs
measured off the ground with remarkable velocity.
But the fright had added so essentially to Miss
Jerusha's
powers of locomotion, that not even Mr.
Crotchet could overtake her, and her pursuers soon
lost sight of her in the darkness of the night, and
gave up the chase and returned home.
Miss Jerusha was not seen at the singing-school
after this, and Mrs. Brown said she stayed at home
because she had a cough. Notwithstanding there
were many rumors and surmises afloat, and some
slanderous insinuations thrown out against Miss
Jerusha
Brown, yet it was never ascertained by the
neighbors, for a certainty, who it was that
demolished
Mr. Buck's window.
One item farther remains to be added to this
veritable
history; and that is, that in three months
from this memorable night, Miss Betsey Buck
became
Mrs. Crotchet of Quavertown.
POSTSCRIPT.
BY MAJOR DOWNING.
When
a lady or a politician writes a letter, you may
generally
expect the most important idea to come into the
postscript
,
jest as the newspaper folks put in a postscript for the
latest news, and sometimes stop the press to announce it.
Whether my postscript here will be the most important thing
in the book, is not for me to say; but it
is the latest news
, so
I've stopt the press to put it in.
The American Review
for June has made an outrageous
attack
upon Daniel Webster, and my literature. It is a
whig
Review, and therefore thinks Daniel Webster is small potatoes.
It is a
literary
Review, and therefore thinks my literature is
worse than nothin. According to my notion, Daniel is able
enough to hoe his own potatoes, and therefore I shant answer
for him; but I have a word or two to say for myself. What
is one's meat is another's pisen; and if the American Review
don't like my literature, it is because he doesn't know what is
good, for every body else eats it and likes it. But let us see
what the Review has to say about me.
[From the American Review for June, 1845.]
American Letters
.Is there an American school of
writers? None, certainly, unless they who degrade and
vulgarise
the tongue and the taste of the country by performances,
the whole merit of which consists in their adoption of
particular
local slang (such as was employed in Major Downing's
Letters, or in the lucubrations of Sam Slick) are the models
of a new and noble literature that is to be for us. When these
things shall found for us a
learning
, the Ethiopian Minstrels
will create for us a Music, and the disciples of Jim Crow a
Theatre of our own.
I am willing to believe, after reading the Publisher's
Preface
to this little book, that there is a Downing school of
literature
in the country, and that I had something to do with it.
But I did not know, before the American Review said so, that
mine was the
only
American school of writers. The
New-York
Evening Gazette copies the paragraph from the Review,
and makes the following remarks about it, which I think prove
that the Gazette can tell a hawk from a handsaw if the
Review
cant.
[From the Evening Gazette.]
The writer of the above amusingly confounds `learning'
with
genius
in the quoted sentence; just as he elsewhere in
the same article confounds the
honor
which the production of
some great poem may confer upon the land which produced it,
with the
poetic associations
wherewith a song-writer like
Burns may clothe that land. We may never, in this country,
produce an Epic that will live; we may never, in these United
States, give birth to a Homer, a Milton, or Tasso, whose
world-renown may proudly reflect upon ourselves. But, a
hundred songs, from anonymous pens if you choose, having
half the merit of those which have given a mystic charm to
the
braes
and brooksides of the land of Burns, would still
associate
a
poetic feeling
with the soil, that might be worth all
the glory of an Epic.
In a word, we may be
nationalized
in literature as well
through our affections as through our intellect; just as we
may be more bound together by the characteristic strains of
a few national airs than by the production of an opera;
while the organ of those airs, if they come from among the
many
, will speak more for the general musical feeling of the
people than the composition of the grandest overture from the
hand of a Master.
The learned Dr. Julius, who was sent here by the King of
Prussia, to make notes upon certain institutions of our country,
carried home with him a scroll of these very `Ethiopian
songs,' at which this Reviewer sneers, as affording proof as
striking as it was interesting, that we had the germs of a
national
music among us; and when his large collection of
minerals
,
pamphlets, &c., &c., was destroyed in the great fire of
New-York, as he was on the eve of sailing for Europethe
worthy Doctor, in trying to replace what he could, was
particularly
careful to supply the place of those humble ditties
which had shared the fate of the vast mass of interesting
materials
which he had been so indefatigable in bringing together
for his royal master.
And now, as to the `Jack Downing and Sam Slick
literature
,'
which this sage Reviewer thinks has the one sole
mission
of vulgarizing the tongue and the taste of the country. We
are not unwilling to admit that it may have, in some degree,
produced this effect; but we care not for a small evil if it be
inseparable from a great good. And this `literature' has
done good; for if not the first sign of
our intellectual
independence
,
it certainly has aided vastly in breaking the servile
chain of provincial imitation. It established the independent
Republic of American jokedom upon the ruins of transplanted
cockneyism.
Now, as for this ere difficulty between me and the editor of
the American Review, I shant stop to have any very long
yarn about it. If I was a
great writer
, as he is, I'd go at
him pell-mell and raise such a dust about his head that he
couldn't be seen again this six months. But I'm only a plain,
blunt man, that speaks right on, and tells folks what they
already
know. I'm something like that old Roman that Mr.
Shakspeare tells aboutfor I do read Shakspeare sometimes
in winter evenings, and like it, it's full of meat as an oyster
so I say I'm something like that old Roman, for I have
neither wit, nor worth, nor words, action, nor utterance, nor
power of speech to stir men's blood; and all I can do is to
point my adversary to the pens of his editorial brethren,
poor, poor, dumb mouths, and bid them speak for me.
The New-York Mirror,I mean the old Mirrorfive or six
years ago, speaking of some of my writings published at that
time, says:
These are the most graphic and really the best Yankee
papers we have ever seen, or expect to see, let who wil write
them. Their author has struck at a new line in literature,
more piquant, racy, and original, than that adopted by `Boz.'
We like him none the less for being `native here, and to the
manor born;' for we are among those who can appreciate
a good production, even before it has received the
commendation
of foreign critics.
The New-York Morning Despatch, April 22, 1839, speaking
of the same writings, says:
The author has the richest and most natural Yankee
dialect
of any writer who has attempted to give the peculiarities
of Jonathan. The wit is real, attic, and something more than
poor orthography.
The New-Yorker, May 25th, 1839, speaking of the same
writings, says:
It is enough to observe that they emanate from the pen of
the original author of the Jack Downing Letters. His
Yankee
stories and style are very diverting, and possess an
originality
and fidelity, which are not discernable in the writings
of a numerous horde of imitators.
The New-York Courier and Enquirer, July 3, 1839, speaks
of the same writings as follows:
There is no doubt that the author of this little volume is
the best painter of Yankee peculiarities that ever wrote. He
is true to nature and never caricatures, but without
caricaturing
,
is most amusing.
There, I might go on in this way and fill up another book.
But I shan't do it; for if the American Reviewer won't
believe
the witnesses I've already brought up, I don't spose he
would believe it if my dear old friend the Gineral should come
back and tell him he was a goose.
So I shall here bid my readers good-by till next time.